Too Juicy for TV 2 and the Bang Tidy Box Set are on sale NOW! Also and i will be at HMV oxford st on the 22nd at 2 
Sketching some designs for next years very looks!!   
xxxx 
exactly darlin 
For those of you commenting on my cat photo from earlier... She is 18 and in very good health for her age after operations etc. 
Radiator love!  
ah thanks 
people's fees? We don't get paid. 
yaye x 
I'll mostly be doing this today
 
Children In Need was so incredible last night! What a phenomenal total!! Well done to everyone who did their bit!! 
hi there cx 
Throw up your Pudsey!  
thanks den! Love ya 
Had such fun tonight on if you have donated already THANK YOU! If you havnt then give it a go!! 03457 33 22 33 
Pick up your phone and call 03457 33 22 33 and do your bit!! Thanks!! #CIN 
If you couldn't open that last blog try this link  
Photos and a new blog. Check it!  
A lovely afternoon of rehearsing for with Sir Terry. Not long now!  
thanks cuz!! Miss u 
Was mostly dressed like this today at celebrity juice! I'm meant to be ivy as Holly is er... Holly!  
yaye x 
Always lovely to catch up with Chase n Status. That new album next year is going to be HUGE! 
Just had my script read through for with sir Terry. My love for that man grows every year. #legend 
thanks 
ah thanks x 
Big thanks to for popping in. Always a joy! Now Little Mix time! #R1livelounge 
Lana is in the building looking gorgeous as usual. She'll be on the show in 15 mins 
love them 
Its ladies day. and Little Mix on the show today #Radio1 
ahhhh awesome!! 
Not long now til get ready for ... 
I swear yoga restores my sanity each week. A still mind is not easily achieved but priceless. Ommmmm 
So tomorrow on my show Little Mix in the Live lounge and a BIG guest popping in. Tune in now to find out who...#BBCR1 
ah thanks 
such a slick performance from mr in the #livelounge from feb of this year!! 
hahah the best photo ever!! 
so excellent seeing you yesterday! Minus the spider stories. So good having a catch up! xx 
OF course! Dedicated to my Ibizan alto ego! 
yes yes and yes!!! Which xmas film is the question?? 
Love my xmas candle!!! 
muffino! Im good. Why are you stuck in scotland? When the hell are you home? Long walk needed! 
ah so lovely of you!! Hope youre well mate!! Big love xx 
yo! THANKS so much for my Olympic baby grows!!! Love is an understatement!! xx 
Today don't forget to REMEMBER. Prayers and thanks. 
you've got my dress on Yaye!! You look so cute!! Xxx 
Getting fancy with icing.  
ibiza style 
thanks x 
no way!!!! 
im wearing peace sign leggins, multi coloured leopard print vans and an orange jumper!! #clashcentral 
love it 
we have just found something sooo rank in the studio this morning! 
Tonight is celebrity juice night!! 10pm itv2! Some seriously weird games on tonight's show! 
no worries hopalong!! 
no worries dude x 
wooop 
thankssss 
wooop 
woop woop 
yaye 
My eyes sting today. Looking forward to bed already. In the mean time loads of nice music on #radio1 
lovely to see you last night doll! 
Mr in the studio next! #bigthing 
yaye x 
Loved meeting all the girls down at the Haringey play association. Thanks for having me. 
Just visited an amazing project that your money funds! Get ready to help out more kids out there next week! It's so important! 
something cute day 17  #somethingcute 
good good 
long walks, chats and strong tea soon! xxxx 
Today mr in the #R1livelounge at 1140am. Any Qs for him then tweet 
#somethingcute  
are you ready for Do You Wanna See Something Cute ?? #somethingcute on the way 
xxxxx 
#secretlisteningclub who is involved? 
oh yeah and by the way follow as he needs friends, i mean he REALLY needs friends. Thanks 
Rhye 'The Fall' lovely bit of music! 
On radio1 NOW! Come have a listen! 
Gutted. Kye was amazing in the sing off tonight. Love you mate x 
Back from Paris in time to see x factor and Downtown. Vote Kye! X 
xxxx 
hahha 
hee hee 
yaye 
#secretlisteningclub shhhhhhh 
Still seeing articles announcing im having a girl. As i said yesterday i DONT even know what im having. End of! 
So chuffed for on their victory last night! 
Glad you all seemed to love last nights Halloween Celebrity juice! It was a bonkers one! 
So tonight its a celebrity juice Halloween special!! Oooooohhh ðŸŽƒ itv2 10 pm 
lovely to see you babe! X 
haha! 
Some reports saying im having a girl. I DONT know what im having so these stories are false. Not sure why journos think its ok to do this 
Bid for shirt that F1's Sebastian Vettel defaced after the Japanese GP..all proceeds to  
My very own little Halloween cat  
always 
Yes... thanks for pointing out i did a typo. On my phone so typing is hazardous. Sorry for all those outraged/shocked/offended (sarcasm) 
a summery of last nights Cosmos  
me freakin out!  Happy Halloween 
i love this track more every day! 
Oh god it's Halloween! Forgot! Have a great day!! #getyourpumpkinsout 
thanks so much for havin me back again! Such a wonderful evening!! Loads of love to you gorgeous Cosmo ladies x 
Last night the Cosmos were in the V&A. My dress needed an iron so I ticked 'being naked in the V&A' off the life list!  
At last I'm reunited with my Bestie!  
The winners tonight were all remarkable people with incredible stories! Ps in the last photo that isn't my carpet! #hotelcrazycarpet 
The cosmos were as inspiring and magical as ever. Loved hosting it again! Feet now so swollen! #icebucket  
Being pregnant I'm also extra emotional at the moment so possible tears on stage. #emo 
Off to #theCosmos. Looking forward to hosting it again this year! Each year I'm knocked for 6 by the amazing women and their stories! 
Thanks so much to for the Live Lounge today! Brilliant! 
Wiley in the live lounge next #R1livelounge 
#secretlisteningclub 
#fannypack 
happy birthday to my lovely boyfriend xxxxxxxxx <3 
good! ALREADY so excited about xmas!!! Must see you before then! Gonna try and pop to Bibas to give her bday prez this week! 
oh god yeah ahah 
hahah 
ah cuz look at your cute profile pic! HOw are you?? 
ha thanks x 
#secretlisteningclub 
ah CM how are yoU??? off tour now? Come for tea soon! 
ah you poor thing! Happy listening 
love my BIG THING this week by BE-A-UTIFUL! 
back from a lovely weekend in Dublin. Now ready for some good tunes on the radio #radio1 
We've been mates for ever. I call him not tweet him because we're mates. 
Loved kyes performance! Soooo good! Amazing start to the show! 
Yaye!! 
ah thanks 
ah thanks babes 
thanks hun 
good on ya 
I canâ€™t wait to present again this year with The line up is amazing and I hope we break another record! Not long now! 
I'm still on the show for the rest of this series too btw. Next weeks Halloween show is a corker! 
But I'm so excited about this next chapter of life. I'll be back on celebrity juice later next year. 
Thanks for all the kind tweets after my announcement on lasts night celebrity juice. I will miss doing the show massively next series... 
The Racoons! Good times!! 
ah thanks man x 
Got any Questions for Matt then tweet 
Matt Smith on the show today just after 11am. #Radio1 
The wanted celebrity juice special is on in 30 minutes! Get near your TVs juicers!! ðŸ“º 
happy to help! 
yes it smells yummy right? 
hope you get it for Xmas!! 
ah thanks x 
Time to get this open and pamper myself.  
xxxx 
thats nice of you 
ahh ta xx 
The nicest band ever?? I think so! #R1rocks #Monthebiff 
Mon the Biff! NEXT up on my show #R1rocks 
Big Tune All Saints Never Ever #radio1 
An exciting day on the show. Biffy Clyro in the Live Lounge at 1140am today!!! #R1rocks 
My juice team this week!  
how lovely is Brian from The Gaslight Anthem! Funny guy! I could chat to him all day! I will get told off by the bosses though. 
ok babe im on it! 
Dear lord of rock and cakes, do not panic. We shall see you when you get here. love fattie 
errr its my radio show what would you like me to talk about ?? YOU?? 
Right big tunes needed today. Who else out there is tired this morning? #radio1 
so good right! 
I also played this on the show today. A gorgeous moment of sound!  
This is my big thing this week and I love it!  
Check out the #DesignerPudsey Collection for launched today in Selfridges. Go and see them! All so cute and amazing! 
NO WAY!!! 
yes Lower Than Atlantis covering Rainbow since you been gone! #r1rocks! Complete with key change! CLASS! 
no worries 
hahah THE BEST!!! 
So Lower Than Atlantis in the Live lounge today at 1140am! #R1rocks 
The ultimate Halloween cardigan!  
All the rock music on radio 1 today is making me sooo happy!!! #r1rocks best day ever! 
Look what i got my hands on! You can get one too next week!  
he is soooo good at cakes its no joke!! 
that is insaneeeeeeeeee 
A whole show of rock music on my show today! #heaven #R1rocks 
Flipping bloody friggin awesome! Yes Kye!! 
The video of Alfie the dog made me cry on this page.  Lovely ending though! 
ah bless ya 
Hahaha westwood dropping Keith on the floor! Ouch!! 
So you all know what night it is right? Celebrity juice night!! Itv2 shattinggggg! 
Just saw the Rolling Stones amazing documentary Crossfire Hurricane. Take me to the 70s immediately! 
yup people like you 
errr ive never worn it before. And are you my stylist...nope 
thankssssssssss happy birthday 
Today on the show singing beautifully in the Live lounge. 10am radio1 
There's a bargain about  
And here is my team!!  
This is head after filming tonight's celebrity juice! Someone might have hit him!  
Ha my cab driver just congratulated me on how good I was on Strictly last weekend! Errrr? Does he mean Britton!!? 
xxxxxx 
you have no clue what youre talking about but thank you 
The most awesome Live Lounge on the way from the year 2000!!! #R1livelounge 
HOT!!! 
cheers for the tarts! 
The lovely is popping into the studio later with a big TUNE. Also my BIG THING from in a tic! #R1 
sooo scores out of 10 for the lemon drizzle-shizzle?? 
ah thats so nice of you xx 
my Bond remake  
Led Zeppelin documentary on sky arts. Lovely stuff. 
thanksssssssssss 
back at ya 
thanks x 
oh and i had a GREAT sunday roast yesterday! 
Things i would have tweeted if my phone had been working this weekend. Downtown was DEPRESSING this week and yaye for Kye on X factor! 
Back in london after a lovely weekend with infrequent phone reception in Bath and Glastonbury. Im back on radio1 at 10am 
Come on Kye!!!!!! 
Yaye kyes mum on x factor! Go Babs! 
he's my best mate 
So tonight it's all about #teamkye  
Anyone in Australia see Celebrity juice this week? It's on channel 7 over there now! 
nans rock 
yes i forgot to ask jess ill ask now!!! 
i miss you babsssss 
jealllllll 
are you watching tonight? It involves something that is prevalent in your life right now! 
yaye 
On tonight's Juice there is a VT with that is so rank! You wait! 
yaye 
Not long til celebrity juice!! 10pm itv2! 
wooop 
Lovely Kelly from stereophonics directed this beautiful video! Have a look  
yes!!!!! 
Love this. New track from the Rolling Stones  grrrrrrrrrrrr! 
yayeeee 
yayeeeeee 
blood tests! poor rudy 
hahahaah 
soooooo good!!!! 
new r1 app which is awesome 
Are you listening? Our song! Jesus on my neck-al-us us us us 
ah thanks doll!! How is pareee 
Yum!  
My cat rudy is old, mad and very British! Drinking tea!  
hahahha 
A lot of you seem to be enjoying unzipped on bbc3! My Disney audition is pretty hilarious! 
Celebrity Juice was fun tonight! and Katie price on my team. Shattered and off home to bed. X 
ah thanks!! 
yaye 
yup!!!! 
its official we LOVE 
you know its a joke right 
blocked 
yaye 
hellloooo 
ah thanks xxx 
haha 
it would be so amazing! 
ah i miss team Inca! Can we do that again one day too 
i have a feeling you may win that! It has to happen 
saw him last week. Not a wig in sight! AHh aura! We have to go back next year!!! 
haaaaaa so on the buns!!! 
New BIG thing from Lana Del Rey on the show today. Also i am a seasonal rebel. Just ate a hot cross bun! 
Poor demot!! Louis just bloody say something! Stressful 
Who saw our new Very advert? 
he's my best mate thank u very much 
Ah I can watch downtown in a calm place. Kye through... Phew! 
haha 
ta xx 
ah thanks 
I know! How am I meant to cope having you both on these shows right now! My nerves are shot!! 
Wow! Just been down to the teen awards! Think my hearing is impaired for good! So loud!! Lovely to meet Ellie Simmonds! Total star! 
Keep voting for call 09020 50 51 10 or text 6505110 #TeamKye 
he's my best mate darlin 
Oh my god I'm the proudest person ever!!! 
Kye Kye Kye Kye â¤â¤â¤â¤â¤â¤ 
Nicole... One thing... Never slag off a take that song! Especially 'do what you like!' #captainbarlowrules 
Ah nearly Kye time. Come on Kye!! 
My boyfriends 7 year old has become the most hilarious vicious 5th x factor judge. 
Not long til x factor. Go on Kye! Can't wait to see what he sings. Love you kyeza! 
Ps I threw 2 back. 
Some moron just raced round the corner in his car totally not looking when I was crossing the road then threw me 2 fingers! Lovely man! 
some people are rude haha 
did you see this last night? Rank  
See how on earth I ended up looking like this...an abandoned clown, on celebrity juice tonight! Itv2 10pm  
ha amazing 
so mum is a legend! Thanks Jan!!! 
looking forward to the Blackout coming in to the studio later! #radio1 
ah so glad you had fun! I still have banana up my nose 
And see why I ended up looking like this at the end of the show!  
My juice team for tomorrows show!  
done! 
yeah yeah 
yup Sweaty NOT sweety 
back at ya sweaty 
good plan stan! lets all meet up for some frozen avocado soon? 
how are you dancing queen? 
hello! Not been on twitter for a bit. How does it work again? I just write random thoughts and actions below 140 characters right? 
30 mins til celebrity juice! Oushhh itv2 
30 mins til celebrity juice! Oushhh itv2 
my mum had it made for my birthday! 
You might just see Keith dressed like this tonight! Celebrity juice TONIGHT at 10pm  
thanks man 
YESSS! Emlin showed me a photo!! CUTE! Well done sis! 
i LOVE you Dynamo, dont listen to those boys 
see ya soon xx 
Thanks for coming on the show tonight and for being a brilliant sport...naturally! 
My awesome team for juice! Jessica Ennis and Joe Lycett  
I dont get all the chat about and her weight. She is still tiny. She should be photogrpahed next to me right now. #igotafatass 
Jake Bugg is on the show next! Questions for him to 
anyone seen tong? Tall guy, probs wearing shades, general legend etc 
see ya in a bit! 
Mumford and sons track on the way from yesterdays live lounge special #rlivelounge 
This just happened at the cinema!  
Cab driver pulls over. Winds window down. " you're that Cat Deely aren't you" errrr nope 
One of my favorite days at work in a long time! Thank you Mumford! #R1livelounge 
Not long til Mumford and sons in the live lounge for their special! #r1livelounge yayeeeeeeeee 
Just saw this cute fox outside the round house! Obviously a Mumford fan!  
Mumford being brilliant at I tunes festival. Not long til our live lounge special with them!!  
haha 
#R1livelounge trending! Adele <3 
im on the radio til 1245 #radio1 
Maggie Smith is a flipping genius! 
oh my god is if 9 years ago!! How??? #cupid 
â¤ you muffin man 
Who just saw my mate on x factor? I'm so proud I could burst into tiny bits 
ah thanks babes 
My new makeup is now in BOOTS! Let me know which bits you like  
Support the lovely running for Gorillas  
This was the greatest night ever  I was there and will never forget this incredible bit of history! 
Don't forget its celebrity juice night itv2 10pm! 
the man! 
The legend that is  
Great to meet you tonight ! Legend! 
Team cotton on juice tonight!  
yaye 
#watfordmassive 
ha woops! 
Looking through fabrics for my very clothing line! ðŸ’—â¤  
amazing i like your style 
i love your brother! Bandana and all 
MUSE in a live lounge special for us on the 28th of sept! #R1livelounge 
live lounge special news on the way! WHO could be next???..... 
cheers xx 
yaye 
BIG live lounge news later on the show! #radio1 
thanks xxx 
Loving show on bbc3! Inspirational! 
yaye!!! X 
Camping it up on a shoot this afternoon!  
yup im a lucky git hee hee 
babes thanks for coming to the show the other day 
thanks to the lovely for popping into the studio today! <3 
Matt Corby on the phone next and a play of his INCREDIBLE song Brother! #radio1 
er im preggers 
Looked cold when i woke up. Am wearing jumper and tights and am sweating at my desk. #whipthetightsoff? 
Why I was smiling a lot on Thursday...  
TOTP are doing a theatre show called and my old TOTP Saturday co hosts are hosting it. Woop! 
Celebrity juice on in 30 mins!!! Itv2 !! 
My hair for the show #veryfearne13  
This is what the catwalk looked like! So happy it all went well!  
 
Back stage at my show!! Am so happy with how it went! #veryfearne13  
My boyfriends sister Leah Wood is also walking in my show today! Good luck Leah!!!!! 
Not long til my very fashion show! So excited! #veryFEARNE13 
thanks doll 
Oi Oi you just got a tweet off yaye 
follow our new show goldfish 
yayeeeeeeeeeeeee 
AHHH fashion show day  
That was a long day! Gonna get some sleep before radio and my fashion show! Ahh big day! Night night! 
My amazing team for celebrity juice! Johnny Vegas and see it tomorrow!!  
ahh my  fashion show is TOMORROW! Excited/nervous! First though Celebrity Juice time! 
love it hahahh 
ha i just mentioned you on air! hahha ( not to her dont worry ) 
ha i forgot about that! Wing woman duties!!! 
#mancrush 
my fave was Jess just shouting "WOW" 
ha "lets do a fun one" 
Actually her twitter name is woops! anyway get your Qs in to #R1livelounge 
Morning. Today on the show is in the live lounge. Any Qs for her #R1livelounge 
Just seen live. Mesmerising live vocal and big lyrics! Proper exciting! 
Matt Corby live! Insanely good!  
Celebrity juice love  
great to see you too! See you thurs doll! #eatentoomuchcake 
#trendola 
ah thanks matty 
ohhh how lovely!! ps can you just jump here? 
<3  
So obsessed with this guy! His voice is unreal!!  
me too GUTTED! 
The Paralympics closing ceremony with Coldplay is bloody brilliant! Rihanna too wooop! 
My home made scones. Cream tea anyone?  
The Maccabees are sounding awesome on right now! 
Some new bits for my very range!  enjoy!! 
miss you more. When can we hang ?? 
still feel awfl babs. Help! Miss you x 
a nice pair of crocs for you babs 
haaa you silly git! Your big toes are insane! They should be in a museum! 
i LOVE video sooo much!!! All i Want is a beaut of a song! 
If you missed this on my show yesterday heres the incredible in the live lounge  
My celebrity juice team this week!  
Ok I couldn't wait!!  
Watch my mate show cooks to market, it's on sky living at 8pm tonight! Good luck Gizzi!! 
ah thanks babes xxxx 
love u back hop along! How is the leg? 
hey dude I hear you're coming to watch celebrity juice soon! See you then x 
Yes now Ill Manors too! Go on then!!!! Oi what you looking at!!! 
Plan B covering Call my name! Owning it!!! WOW! 
Plan B is in the Live Lounge today. Any questions get them over to and use #R1livelounge 
This is out now! Thanks for having me again!  
This song is BEAUTIFUL and this is the best music video ive seen in ages  (i cried watching it) 
#tapdancingmice 
Morning! Just about recovered from the jaffa cake eating live on air. Thanks 
Such an awesome owl vase my cousin got me for my birthday!  
Thanks to my neighbour Fogie for these!!  
bugger NEXT year! 
thanks bruv love ya x 
no way! you ok?? x 
thankyou my darlin xx 
ha ha thanks man xx 
No way! The Vaccines covering Taylor Swift!! #R1livelounge 
wish i could how are you lady???? 
thanks doll x 
The Vaccines in the Live Lounge NEXT on my show! #R1livelounge 
thanks doll! see you next week! x 
thanks Paul!! x 
ahh love that pic 
thanks sweetness x 
thamls guys x 
Thanks you lovely lot 
cheers babes xx 
i sure did!! 
thanks for my gorgeous flowers you lot!!!!! xxxxx 
Thanks gorgeous x 
Thanks Ronan!!!! xxx 
thanks babes xxx 
birthday cake for breakfast it is! 
birthday cake for breakfast it is! 
love you babs 
ahhh wonderful!! 
Thanks JO!! Maybe theyll turn up for this year?? xxx 
Sure am!! 
thanks sc xxxx 
Awwwww thanks u guys love u back 
thanks babes x 
Thanks very much for all my lovely birthday tweets! 31 ahhh! 
Dad lighting me a birthday lantern! Make a wish!  
Aunty Karen made me this birthday cake for tomorrow! Ha!  
Just building a wigwam in my kitchen. It's slightly bigger than it looked online! 
If you missed it earlier here is a link to me chatting to Cheryl  
loveeeee you guys 
if you wanna see  get on that webcam #R1cheryl 
On my show is coming in for a chat. If you have a question tweet to #R1cheryl 
It so felt like a chicken! HAha 
15 minutes to celebrity juice on itv2!!!! 
To get you in the mood  
Not long til you can see the new series of celebrity Juice on itv2 TONIGHT!! Ouuushhhhh ðŸ‘ 
With my girls from 
@CoppaFeelPeople today!  
so lovely to see you last night mr K! Itll be a good one tonight 
sure did!! 
yesssssss 
ok my team are on it!! We'll DEFO be in touch! 
can you come in next thurs or friday?? We would LOVE you in! 
shout out!!! 
get those gold stars man!! 
any questions for Scouting For Girls then tweet #r1livelounge 
will do! We are big fans! Good luck with getting 'that job' 
SO good to meet you!! Should be a wicked show tonight! xx 
New celebrity juice on itv2 tonight!!! My feet have yet to recover from something rank that happened on the show! You'll see! 
My awesome team for celebrity juice and Kelly Brook  
At celebrity juice is getting changed in the make up room and my make up lady Jj is having a right gawp! 
no worries doll 
Gregs desk at work is like that tv show hoarders  
so lovely to see you babes! Pop in for a cuppa when you lads are next in london 
so good to chat to the lovely this morning. Love Ma Ma Ma Ma Ma Ma Ma Ma mama-adness! 
see you there doll x 
ahh christmas song! Still love it! roll on December 
Florence* 
photos and videos from Reading Festival. Including impression of Florene and the Machine  
what fun we had! I wish reading was every weekend! 
â¤â¤â¤â¤â¤â¤â¤â¤  
Magical! The foo's #reading  
sure is!! I've watched him work his balls off for years so I'm so happy he is getting seen! 
dude he has been my best mate since we were kids! 
Just watched back my best mate Kye on x factor last night and cried my eyes out infront of everyone. Proud doesn't even cover it! 
Turns out Greg is in the hotel room next to me. He heard me laughing from next door so popped his head out to say hi  
too right!! 
A man in the crowd just pulled his trousers and pants down at me. Unfortunately didn't look away quick enough. #sawasausage 
Yessss! It was one of there first gigs! Love them!! 
Kasabian were born to headline Reading! Total eternal love for this band 
Having such a laugh with greggles on bbc3 tonight! Love Reading festival! Always good vibes! 
Who saw my best mate Kye on x factor tonight? I'm so proud! Someone who has never given up! 
If you missed it last night.  
Me and old greggles have just eaten some chocolate mousse and are ready to go live! Bbc3 8 pm! #reading  
no worries its a beaut! x 
you dirt bag LOVE you 
GORGEOUS! how come youre going paris?? 
Think ive broken a new world record today. The most ginger biscuits eaten in one sitting 
Thanks so much for all the lovely comments about lasts night Fearne and...James Blunt. He is a top bloke! Its repeated on itv2 on tuesday 
thanks babes 
the best!!! 
yaye x 
haaaa 
thanks babes 
yaye thanks 
ah thanks man ! 
1 hour til Fearne and...James Blunt on itv2! 
ahhh good luck!! 
oh dear!! 
noooooo 
Morning sickness should be called ALL DAY Sickness. False advertising! ðŸ‘Ž 
get excited lady! 
we most definitely were! 
Are you ready to see the worst skier in the world ( ME! ) and some weird business in Ibiza with James Blunt! 1045pm TONIGHT 
Not long til Fearne and... James Blunt is on watch it tonight for a mad adventure! 
Take 1  
Filming some new stuff for the Boots website about my 3rd make up range  
i might just be quite soon actually!! I will be your wing woman! 
love cat pictures! Cant get enough! Hope youre well man 
oh my god i want!!!! 
are these your cats?? SO CUTEEEEE 
#petshaming is now trending number 3 in the UK! yaye head to the R1 facebook page to see loads! 
#petshaming is trending 
Good luck with GCSE results today! I have sweaty palms for you! 
TONIGHT you can see Fearne and...James Blunt on itv2! Warning! Involves strange goings on with washing machines and a few lumo toxic shots 
hello x 
another off the beaten track musical discovery tonight... this beautiful cover  
yesss i get to hang out with all next week muffin whoop whoop xxxx 
(or fattie) x 
i have just emailed you!!!!! YOU HAVE TO BE THERE! 
Am getting slightly side tracked listening to wonderful old BBC recordings of Led Zeppelin. BLISS! 
Nice suggestions you lot! Giving me some more ideas for my music-searching/youtube-surfing/itunes-browsing ta x 
Working out music for my  fashion show in sept. Im going for atmospheric dreamy tracks. Could do this all night. So fun 
Sam and the Womp sounding awesome in the #R1livelounge Brass section sounding tight 
good luckkkk 
This Thursday get ready for this... 
 
Wrong Direction AKA and are INSANE! #r1livelounge 
"cycling is like running but with a seat" Gary Pounder i love you 
I love you! cant wait to see youuuuuu 
i love that your twitter name has (babs) next to it 
More musical reviews from my amazing god son Bram on radio 1 next! 
Also today on the show new music from Muse, Lucy Rose and Alt J!! #radio1 
was so fun! What a night! The film is BRILLIANT! ouushhhh 
In the cinema i was sat next to and their mum who thought I was a fan trying to talk to them! 
Loved Keith Lemon the Film! So rude and funny! Ouuuushhh 
Sweating in the car on the way to the premier of Keith Lemon the Film  
very much enjoyed today's show. Thanks for listening. Big love! 
my god son Bram seems to have some fans! 
Alex Williams. Never to be forgotten. An amazing Teen Hero x 
Hey im back on radio1 at 10am. Had a nice week off laying around and listening to Cave Painting's album sampler. Its a beaut! 
My lovely mate has just tipped me off that you can see Tom Daly live tonight on bbc3 at 830pm 
thanks darlin x 
love youuuuu!!!!! xxxx 
Today on the show straight from the airport! #radio1 
thanks lads! I think i get my copy of your album today! WOOP!! 
love u 
ha! I'll sleep on that one! 
thank u poppet x 
on no!! Ha x 
hahah 
thanks mel! 
Jesse and I have some news!!!!! 
 
Look at this rather decadent cup of tea Greg James just bought me!  
so good just played it on the show! LOVE 
loving watching Tine and Lab on the radio 1 website! #vintagelivelounges 
New Mumford Make me melt 
haaaaa 
have another cracking day on the telly Jakey! You have been more than amazing on this coverage! Love ya 
yaye have fun babes! 
Love this new track by The Tribes. A beaut!  
The Brownlee brothers are amazing! Another good day for team GB 
so gutted i cant make it 
Lemon time  
yaye sounded awesome!!! 
LOVE the new track!! 
blowing a kiss at Moyles was bad idea Do you know what youve started! Hes in <3 
you filming already?? yayee!!!!!! Text me and tell me how it goes!! 
a only just seen it! I have a meeting at 1pm tomorrow noooooo!!!! I so wanna see it! Is that the only one hound?? 
an interview with The Vaccines on the show in 10 mins 
My home made carrot tray bake  
Well done a total champ. #bronze 
Yes Pendleton!! My heart was beating out of my chest there #gold 
Yaye my silver brogues made it into Marie Claire  
i WISH i could! GOOD LUCK lady 
ah thanks xx 
woopwoop 
haaaaa 
hilare isnt it!! 
time for the diary of a kids tv presenter #radio1 
why you following me then? 
Keith Lemons new show is tonight from 10pm on itv2! Apparently I'm In the first ep! Oh god! 
one mistake in days of live unscripted tv. He is incredible. 
yeah but how easily done is that. He has no auto cue and riffs naturally and professionally. He makes it look easy 
My mate is sooo good on the bbc olympic coverage. Slick and brilliant. 
Come on Kristian Thomas!! #teamGB magical gymnastics! 
Just made these filthy chocolate brownies with maltesers in! They shall be eaten in a celebratory style for Wiggo!  
yaye my faves! 
Wiggins!!!!!!!!!!! Total legend!!! 
yesssss id win 
get on the R1 website and watch all these incredible live lounges! 
1st GOLD for #teamGB yayeeee 
Interview with Calvin Harris on my show NEXT #radio1 
when you next in ? I'll make you some! 
My own recipe strawberry vanilla cupcakes with strawberry filling  
More 'Diary of a Kids tv Presenter' tomorrow on my show from my ACTUAL diary! 
im not having a go. Im just sick of people being negative for no reason. Spread good vibes instead 
pathetic. Im sure youre a perfect human in the position to judge others 
It is unreal that anyone would send abusive tweets to our athletes. Theyve worked so hard and deserve our support! #GOteamGB 
see you in a bit Jordan 
ha amazing 
ha glad my kids tv diaries are providing much laughter. CRINGE! #OTT 
yaye CONGRATS! Was watching and cheering madly at the TV!! 
The #teamGB should WOMP during their warm ups!! 
Today on the show Alex from coming in to talk about his stunning performance at the opening ceremony! #bbcr1 
Watching Rebecca Adlington on tv smashing it in the pool. So exciting!! Go on girl! 
What a wonderful moment for Redgrave! 
I reckon Beckham is worried about his hair on that windy boat. Looks dapper though! 
Loving the doves!! Safe to cycle round London like that?? I may try! 
So glad I stayed awake! #bikeangels beautiful!!! 
Yes Arctics! Show the rest of the world what we are about!! 
Arctic monkeys!!! Yes lads!!!! 
I'm now fully in Olympic mode. Loved Duran Duran in Hyde park earlier and now Danny Boyles Spot on ceremony! 
Spectacular dancers through out tonight's opening ceremony! Totally beautiful! 
The Queen and James bond has made my year! #openingceremony 
thanks man 
WOMP! 
NO CARS I repeat NO CARS on the road! 
#GoTeamGB 
yes go to Toi on sunset for rock n roll thai food! YUM! Melrose for great shopping!! 
After being warned to leave early for work i experienced no traffic at all driving through London today. Think i saw two cars. 
Today's nails!!  
All going well on the shoot. Mild sweating but all fun. 
So if you've been following today.... It's me doing the cover shoot today! 
hahaha SHOUT OUT!! 
yes Deli! #wompingdownunder 
Who is ready to WOMP?? 
Anna's stylophone skills are insane! 
Today Mr in the live lounge on my show 
what a guy what a shirt! Thanks for coming on the show 
haaaa POPPING NOT POOPING hahaha 
On todays show calling up for a chat, Toddla T pooping in and an Anne Hathaway and Joseph Gordon Levitt interview #radio1 
Ps if you don't know much about my mate kris read this  
Just had lunch with my wonderful mate and chatted about exciting new stuff!  
not a hipsta thanks very much i just havnt watch it in ages. Im usually at work when its on. Thanks for your lolvey tweet 
woopwoop 
love this vintage live lounge from Jason Derulo!! #ridinsolo 
#bombombom 
good on ya!! Enjoy the sun darlin x 
YES Murs you legend!! Quite buff too! Watch out for chafing! 
DO IT 
the gorgeous will be popping in to the studio at 1040am today #radio1 
Cake blog Â 
 
great song and big response this end! 
yayee 
just brilliantly outed Rachel on the show! #summertimesickness hahah 
yes it SHOULD!!! #womp 
you gotta do a version for the show for me!! #rizzlewomp 
yes! Womping always! 
#bombombom 
yes well up for that! Lovely to see you and your gorgeous house!! 
My Big Thing this week is ridiculous and GREAT! #holidaytune on the way! #radio1 
Just made these alcoholic cosmopolitan cupcakes!  
Awesome place to sunbath!  
Lovely day in the park with lovely people in the actual SUN 
miss u more H! Xxxx 
Watching download festival on sky arts! Steel Panter up next! #bighairrock 
hello x 
amazing! Yeah I saw them at shep bush and at reading!! 
Forgot how good Edward Sharpe and the Magnetic Zeros album is. Playing it loud! 
i know ill get on this! 
New Alberta Cross track is making me smile from ear to ear! A total delight!! #radio1 
delayed response but id say a fern plant 
Tina Moore TUNE! #garage<3 
dude you will love it!!! 
Hear my chat with Anne Hathaway and Joseph Gordon Levitt today on the show #radio1 10am #darkknightrises 
Might have played this in my set tonight!  
Tonight line up! I am a mere interlude! Should be a good night!  
im officially in love with Anne Hathaway. Just interviewed her and the lovely Joseph Gordon Levitt and they are wonderful #gush 
so is joining the line up for tonight's night !  See you there 
going to be writing out my interview for Anne Hathaway and Joseph Gordon Levitt in the next couples hours. Let me know if youve got any Qs 
xxx 
Playing out a vintage Dave Grohl #r1livelounge BLISS! Love that man a bit too much 
never had a wondow cleaner round to mine before so thats a lie 
hey xx 
Drove by stone henge at the weekend. A truly magical place.  
Rudy wants you all to know its a tough life being a cat.  
haha 
xxxx 
woop vwoop 
thanks guys x 
it SOOOO good!!! 
moooorning 
Today The Midnight Beast in the studio from 11am. #radio1 10-1245 xx 
FIT! 
Regretting wearing an optimistic outfit today! #clouds #shouldhaveknownbetter 
YES in the live lounge! Im in heaven! 
Alt J in the live lounge NEXT on the show! 
babes i cant come now this afternoon . Rachel will call and explain soooo SORRY!!!! Ill text you after the show! 
ah i know im so excited!!! Have a lovely time on the beach darlin xxxx 
you in London doll? 
Today in the Live Lounge on my show! Yaye! #radio1 
SOOOOO excited for Alt J in the Live lounge tomorrow on my show #radio1 
thank you ( i think) 
xxx 
i REALLY like this new No Doubt tune! Summer vibes! 
New No doubt on my show NEXT! #radio1 
no worries babs! beaut tune! 
get your #morningfearne pictures in now. 
cute x 
Find out what the nations favourite number 1 is now on itv! 
Tonightâ€™s the night we find out #nationsfaveno1 folks! Check out at 9.30pm  
More is more  
thanks babes xx 
heyyy 
#getmeoutofthisbox 
cute!!! 
my BIG THING from mr next on the show 
have a good one dude. My brother is there and is excited to see your set! 
Yes hit list done!!!! 
who did you meet off the hit list in the end?? 
Some amazing photos at the Stones 50 exhibition last night. Some incredible historic moments and some very tight trousers caught on camera 
loving volcano Live! 
My feet today! Don't mess!  
hahahahaha 
xxx 
got to go in the loft at the rents and see if i can dig out Mike Read's Pop Quiz board game! 
haha 
I'm DJing 19th July with & for Get tix here -www.wegottickets.com/event/172392 
Been stuck behind a parked car causing traffic cursing and then spotted it was Ian Brown behind the wheel! So glad I didn't toot my horn! 
Donâ€™t forget to vote for your Number 1 Single before itâ€™s too late!  Next show is Sat at 9pm on #nationsfaveno1 
a great mate and an inspiration at work. <3 you 
Now ive finished the show i would like to say how much ill miss Chris being on radio1. He has always supported me at radio1 and been... 
Yaye well done NEW Breakfast Show Dj!! #radio1 
yaye GO girlll 
ahhh i love this pic! never seen it! LOVE you xxxx 
yaye thanks! 
Just made a banana loaf from new book!  
Wear * ( running/typing in rain ) 
Possibly the wrong foot ware option for today's torrential rain!  
yaye 
live lounge next tuesday! #radio1 
yaye nice one hound! 
Drop it like its HOT! 
jump online to the radio1 website if you want a visual clue to who my mystery guest is! Im obviously not allowed to look! 
awwwww 
thanks babes 
My phone does not predict the weather. It just changes to what ever the weather is accordingly on the day! Cheat! 
hahah 
nice memories from our Adele Live Lounge special back in 2011. #r1livelounge 
nice memories from our Adele Live Lounge special back in 2011. #r1livelounge 
wow 
xxxx 
you will do this one day but also will be shouting out to younsters "i used to be on radio1 ya know" 
i know!!! 
yes I KNEW you would love the nerdy facts on this show! X 
Glad a load of you are enjoying The Nations Favourite Number 1! I love all the stories behind the songs! #itv1 
Me and Rudy are sleepy on the sofa. Hope you've all has a good Sunday! X  
thanks babes 
The Nations Favourite Number 1 is on itv1 tonight at 9pm! Enjoy and get voting for your all time fave! 
Maccabees sounding so slick live at T in the park #bbc3 
Hope you enjoy the show on Sunday! The first of three!  
The Nationâ€™s Favourite Number 1 starts Sunday at 9pm ITV1 & you can now vote for your Number One single from the Top 10  
ha destiny! 
thanks man 
Jack White is just a frikkin legend. LEGEND! 
xxx 
thanks man 
yaye 
no shout out if you tell me to shut up first soz 
hahah 
yup ~balloonhair 
The Jack White interview on my show in 10 mins! Spread the word! #bbcradio1 
haha 
Of Monster of Men <3 <3 <3 
if you missed this yesterday!  on my show 
My brain feels like its been through a car wash watching ! How does he do it?? 
no worries babes nice to meet u 
Yaye new show on watch now!! 
and that is saying something 
Still talking about HE BENT HIS FINGER IN HALF INFRONT OF ME!! How is this possible! 
hahah he liked it actually!! hahah 
#r1dynamo 
xxxx 
xxxx 
today on the show You can listen on the radio and watch it online! Radio 10am. 
thanks for bringing the new track in dude good to see you x 
Wow sounded gorgeous covering Maroon 5's Payphone in the Live lounge. Thanks man! #radio1livelounge 
happy birthday to my amazing dad LOVE you x 
Fringe out, make up off. Home time.  
hahah 
Got a fake fringe for this very shoot. Always tempting to get one cut but I know it would annoy after days!  
Check out The Nations Favourite Number 1 which im presenting on itv on Sunday this week! 
off to a  photo shoot. Hair and make up muchos needed. 
ahhhh Bajan sand in Aleph! Are you loving it??? I miss you 
yes i obviously love all of this! 
watterssss 
the lovely on my show today! Also dressing as a chick AGAIN! Radio1 10am 
<3 
cool got voice overs after la radio so will call u later!! 
love this!! 
it was a magnet!! hahah! You about laters?? 
i miss this car!! 
yaye 
On my show today Alex from Two Door Cinema Club! 10am radio 1 
ha I'm a mad cat lady! Must see you lovely newly weds soon!! 
Better not leave out Tallulah!  
Me and the old girl Rudy!  
Lil fatty Keloy!  
#boots my new make up out soon  
At the #bootschristmaspressshow showcasing my new make up and bath stuff!  
yaye 
#MichaelKiwanuka 
oh thanks babes 
There's some NEW pieces on my very page including my new boots that im so excited about!  
If you missed it yesterday this is my Hackney weekend photo blog  
just watched the trailer for Keith Lemon the Film. Genius! Cant wait to watch the full feature! 
oh yeah set sounding sooo good from the weekend! Love Love Loveeeee 
on my show sounding so good live from Hackney! radio1 
 photos from my Hackney weekend 
Wearing these awesome rainbow socks that boyfriends mum made me! <3  
Back On bbc3 at 7pm with and the gorgeous live from hackney weekend 
Due to previous bad angles Greg has made me post another photo!  
End of hackney day 1! Back on bbc3 Tomorrow at 7pm!  
 <3 <3 <3 this lady 
 oh the glamour! Check out 'backstage' at radio1 
The gorgeous on my show today! Radio1 10am! I still love this song/video a lot  
smooth talking Dans story about him being a body double and stuck in the back of a car made me laugh A LOT!! 
yayeeeeee 
 
xxxx 
haha. Miss you dolly 
Excited to DJ at the night on 19th July with + more. Tickets here -  
Nerdy book blog  
sooooo gutted for our callers on the show just now! More chances to win Hackney weekend tickets on radio 1 today!! 
Haim <3 Haim <3 Haim <3 
My big thing from Haim my girl band crush next on my show #radio1 
B.O.B in the Live Lounge today! #radio1 
So many incredible guests on my show this week! I shall tell all at about midday! #radio1 
LOVE this song  
love ya sis xx 
xxxx 
in my last few tweets i have not said people cant have an opinion. Opinions are one thing, out right bullying is another. VERY different 
xxxxx 
thanks doll x 
love back at you sibbers xxxx 
Im from a working class family and have worked hard to get to where i am today. Others will just sit and do nothing but judge. 
Thanks for your nice tweets guys! I was bullied at school so there's no way im having it again as a grown woman. 
xxxxxxx 
thank you babes xxx 
right this is what im talking about. YOU=bully. Take a look at yourself. I have been working nonstop for 15 years thank you 
On todays show RIta Ora singing live from the Hackney academy #radio1 
Good vibes and happiness all round. 
Im a postive person who believes in treating people kindly. I dont understnad the mentality of others who think differently. 
Grown men who slag me off in articles/online are huge bullies. I love my job and wouldnt be doing it if i wasnt any good at it. 
People who sit lazily and judge others will never grow. They'll never take a look at themselves or feel content. Shame so many do. 
Photos from my jubilee weekend  
In 10 minutes Kelly Clarkson in the Live lounge on my show! #R1livelounge 
It was also brilliant being part of the bbc one team today. Huw Edwards is a total legend! 7 hours of spotless tv! 
Thoroughly enjoyed today's jubilee celebrations. The fly over was so exciting and the atmosphere was ace. #proudtobebritish 
Such a fun night at the jubilee concert!  
Just interviewed sir Elton John. Life complete! 
The HMS Belfast veterans I have been with all day are the most amazing men. I love Jim and John! 
 
Jubilee weekend! Have fun what ever you're doing! X  
so nice to meet you today darlin!! Xx 
I'm at the hackney academy getting ready for my radio show. Radio1 10am. in the live lounge! 
Pretty exciting the celebrity juice app  
woop 
On a photo shoot in an amazing house with glass floors!  
Cheers its a very dress from my collection too! 
happy birthday Love you lil bro xxx 
thanks guys! 
wooooooooooooooooooo 
Blog time. Loads of photos, cats eating cake, nail art and Mr Lemon  
Now off to a BIG  meeting for my new collection 
thanks for listening to the show today! Love my listeners. Have a gorgeous day! 
wooop 
ah bless ya 
what a night  
#comeonPiven 
i know im a lucky git!! You looked beaut!! HUGE love xxx 
you looked hot last night woman! 
Thanks for the best night guys! 
Theyskens theory and D&G shoes 
Hello Jeremy! Great to meet you last night! Still wanna come on the radio show? 
yessssssssssss 
didnt think this would be up your street! Its amazing isnt it! Ive been supporting it for a while now! 
thanks babes 
 
i made so many cakes this weekend! banana loaf, marshmellow choc cupcakes, pancakes... 
such a good idea! I love your new cook book!!! MISS YOU x 
lads you are excellent!! Good luck and we'll play you again soon! #eatingsandals 
1145am babes! You been at the gin? 
xxxx 
thanks guys 
thanks babes 
vintage 1930s from Relik!! 
woooo 
ah thanks guys! 
cuteeee 
how lovely of you thanks 
This Josh Osho track which is my BIG thing must sound so good if your in the sunshine right now #radio1 
thank Jo!!!! Madness!!! See you tomorrow! xxxx 
ahhh one day to go!! 
Ouuusshhhh  
Tonight celebrity juice won a BAFTA and I met Mary Berry! Over the moon! 
All posh at the BAFTA's  
Just went for a run and a bird crapped on my actual FACE! That has to be good luck for tonight right ? #BAFTA's 
ha not sure I could handle C these days! Too much running about! Ha 
Ok I have to seriously go to bed. Night! Go Englebert! 
hahahahah Lolz 
hahahahah Lolz 
Ok I tried to turn the tv off but have become transfixed with Moldova! The locomotion dance Moldova style! 
really is fantastic!! 
I had 4 hours kip last night so am fading. Time for bed. Bye bye Eurovision. You've been fun once again. 
hahahah 
So many good 80s jumps in the air! 
Yes 
Those foot movements are making my arse cheeks clench! Cringeeeee #malta 
the foot movement made my arse cheeks invert! So cringe! 
This lot need to stay away from naked flames. Hairspray Over load #malta 
What the heck are they doing behind those capes? #turkey 
hahahah 
Have the backing dancers had an allergic reaction to something ? #greece 
Did the bloke in the hoodie playing cello not get told he was going to be on Telly? 
I think their mate who got left in the green room lucked out! 
Moon walking and playing the bag pipes! 
Man sat crossed legged on the box in the back ground wailing is making me laugh! #eurovision 
She is very happy to be playing violin! #iceland 
Im creeped Out already. #iceland 
hahaha 
The lady with the bread roll on her head sounds like she is in pain #eurovision 
Had a lot of fun djing tonight in Mayhem. Thanks for having me gang! 
yaye 
no worries! Looking forward to the live lounge doll! 
thanks babes 
#JAMBO 
i love your coffee based tweets! ha 
Right MORE good tunes on the way, Planet Earth live and showbiz gossip coming up! 
that are factually incorrect in your daily lives. Relax. Not the end of the world. 
hilarious that people have such a pop at me on twitter when i say something wrong on the radio. Think of how many things you say that... 
wooooo 
wooohooo 
yeah love those guys!! 
London taaaawn  
Loretta the horse  
Not long now! Get voting!!  oushhhhh 
good luck with it dude 
sooo good 
On the show today good tunes, interview, and sunny vibes. #radio1 
THIS is a fake me on twitter. Far too many people following a fake. 
how did i miss this? ps currently sat reading a new cook book in the office! 
I'm wearing this today  
good right!!! #80'ssummervibes 
blocked 
ha thanks babe 
woooo! 
LOVE! 
hahaha 
wooop 
yaye 
hahaha 
Not long til this happens  get down there 
And the hives! I remember when they came on Top of the Pops when I first started presenting it. Great live band! 
Yes on #joolslive is awesome! also loving dress! 
miss you too much come home woman!!! 
Chillin in the garden in my pjs. Bliss  
it was wicked doll THANKS!! 
you can do it!! 
thanks man 
Im in the basement in my studio at radio1 but have heard the SUN IS OUT in the upstairs world!! YAYE!!! 
hahahah 
wowwwwwwwwwwwwwww LOVE THIS!!! 
ha no we are mates so all good! 
no worries babes x 
Had a lovely walk to work today. London hidden treasures.  
Today Lostprophets are in the live lounge. 1140am on my show. Radio1 
yaye 
the best song!! 
happy birthday!! Live lounge tomorrow! woop! 
thanks babes 
thanks xx 
yaye 
photos from my weekend!  
Dont drop it, set your hair on fire and or trip up... 
Torch <3  
The Olympic torch! An honour to carry it on stage at the radio1 Torbay dance event.  
blocked 
A tough battle! Well done Moyles the champ! Well deserved! Food needed I'm drained! 
Wow set is incredible. Torbay is rocking! 
6pm let battle commence #radio1  
Me and Moyles in Devon. Listen in from 4 pm radio1!  
Groove Armada to finish my mad week on the show! HEAVEN! 
wooooop 
 in my studio 
nice right! 
oh godddddd what a dream!! 
Loving fat boy slim on bbcR1 
At the bbc  
Just had a nice meeting with and Huw Edwards for the royal jubilee coverage. Cant wait! 
looking good Captain! 
Awesome to have and at Had a lovely chat with Kim and got a wave off K West! 
Miss in the studio on my show in an hour and a half. #R1KimK 
Today on my show in studio and all live streamed online. 10am! Be there! Radio1 
THANK YOU! Now get some sleep!! xxx 
oh god i cant get over that Live Lounge today!!! in LA, FUN in London all sounding PERFECT!! #R1livelounge 
Fun in the live lounge sounding gorgeous! #R1livelounge 
SO singing with FUN in the live lounge on my show at 1140am! LA London HOOK UP!! #R1livelounge 
BIG unexpected news about today's Live Lounge with Fun in a minute! #R1livelounge 
thanks babes xx 
Josh Osho sounding good too! 
Loving on jools live! 
ah nO worries! 
thanks x 
We are going to induct your OLD icharger into the imuseum 
blocked 
Lucky me  
Peace  
Listening to Bob Marley getting my make up done with for a bbc promo 
happy birthday lil one! Xxx 
Thank you darlin!!!!!!!!! 
#R1livelounge sounding gorgeous 
thanks babes xx 
thanks suella!!! love ya 
thanksssss 
wooooop  
Captain thanks for singing at the Sonys and making my winning night even better! Perfect end to the night! 
thanks cuz love ya 
thanksssssssss 
thanksssssss 
thankssss 
babes LOVED YOUR DRESS MISSY!!!! 
thanks ! 
thanks hound dog! Mad love x 
Me and my radio1 team last night. Still in shock.  
Legend!  
Still cant believe I won a Sony. Not sinking in. Thank you to all my lovely listeners and to all at radio1!  
Ahhhhhh  
Thanks muffin love u 
call you when I'm there Cornish! 
On my way to the Sony's. Dress so tight I can't breathe! 
Incase you missed this earlier my cat has a bad new hobbie  
as its my show i play songs I like weirdly! Hence i LIKE them all! 
woooop 
look what i caught my cat doing! Hilarious!  
I love Gremlin #planetearthlive 
Obsessed with my new Del Rey bag. Yum!  
Not long now. Have a bid if you fancy owning my face britain painting!  
off to find an outfit for the SONY's on monday night. 
ahh thats made my day! 
yaye 
ahhh so exciting! 
thanks for lending us the matrix and futurebound mini mix it just went down a treat on the show! 
thanks babes! Chat tuesday! #r1livelounge 
thanks babes 
thankssss 
Lovely dinner and gossip with now bed time. Night night you lot. 
She is called Rudy and is 16! 
dude she is 16 have some respect! Moron! 
Look who wants to say hi...  
no worries babes!! beaut track! 
ah god i know i miss you so much babs! Which nights are good for you next week? 
so this lady on my radio show next thursday LIVE! 
Thats right Kim Kardashian in the studio NEXT Thursday and itll be live online! #radio1 
Thats right Kim Kardashian in the studio NEXT Thursday and itll be live online! #radio1 
ah sweet! 
hahah so last week! 
ah thank you x 
Pleased to say my face Britain portrait is doing rather well. Bid if you fancy a chance of owning it!  
of course i did!!! 
thanks for your geeky office knowledge last night. Youll be pleased to hear it was series 1 ep4! Gareth get the guitar! 
if you mised this yesterday have a watch! Delightful!  #R1livelounge 
heavenly music coming out of the live lounge right now! #R1livelounge 
Bob, barking and baking. This is what i got up to this bank holiday  
Today on my show in the live lounge! #radio1 
Good night from Keloy!  
No worries! 
Just watched Bob Marley documentary at the cinema. Brilliant. Amazing footage, great stories and obviously the best soundtrack. 
yaye 
wooop 
x 
thanks doll 
Had a lot of fun doing the show today! Thanks for watching/listening! 
I'll be on radio1 straight after Reggie at 10am this morning. Hope you're all having a lovely bank holiday! 
Just got ID'd buying 4 beers! Brilliant! 
heehee 
hahah 
My home made London cheesecake  
Still getting tweets about the balloon popping antics on last nights celebrity juice. Haha! 
so sweet xx 
On tonight's celebrity juice I am made to play a game that made me laugh so much I could barely breathe! Itv2 10pm! 
Babies, books and Blunderbuss  
Catching up on Ronnie's sky arts show and am watching the Pattie Boyd one. Great stories! <3 her too much! 
and im sure your own radio show would be thrilling! 
hello! 
yes go for it! love a place name drop! VEGAS woop! 
pah ha! 
hahha 
 my face Britain portrait! ON sale today! 
#fearneinthebooth  
ah i know panic what to wearrrr! 
yup ! ha 
hahah 
still so chuffed about this  
1040am #fearneinthebooth radio1! 
you might just hear me rap on the show today! WARNING! 
yaye!!! 
Just met my mate 's baby! In love! 
dj brambles!! Mcfly review on the way! 
wooop! x 
more musical reviews from my gorgeous god son Bram on the way! 
thanks babes 
Today Tulisa in the live lounge at 1140am #radio1 
happy birthday betsyyyyy 
Had a lovely time celebrating birthday. First time ive seen Leigh and not Keith in ages! 
total scatter brain today. Classic monday stuff. My brain is still on the sofa at home watching Californication! 
YUM! 
so gooood!!!! 
happy birthday xxx 
New Maroon 5 on my show next! #radio1 
my genius god son being brillianton the radio! <3 
HAPPY BIRTHDAY! 
love this 
This guy from maroon 5 having a chat on the phone and their NEW song! Radio 1 10am! 
Nans 90th!  
Vicky sponge with jam ! 
Made this for my nan Rubys 90 th! Happy birthday nanny!  
Just got around to watching last nights Very important people. Morgana's Danny Dyer impression has made me cry tears of joy. 
mark mahoney at shamrock the only place to go! 
thanks mAn 
Dont forget to watch my mate Morgana on her new show on channel 4 at 930pm! 'VERY IMPORTANT PEOPLE!' 
no I owe you a pint for making that tune! Huge! 
yes you have! Xx 
Done it again! Same outfit!  
ah my painting is mentioned here!  
brilliant 
Tuesday on my show Tulisa in the live lounge! #radio1 
ah bless ya 
hahaha 
Juice time 
Hey gang! Celebrity juice in one hour on itv2! 
xxxxx 
ah thanks man 
what a tragic way to talk to someone you dont know! 
#totallyrancid 
totally rancid tune! (i must be getting old, not heard that one before) 
theres some classics in there! 
boo its 's last day on the show for 6 months! #sobsintopasty 
im british i talk about the weather. Its mandatory. Get over it 
i love my god son 
another delightful picture! I adore these so much! 
Great gig at CAMP tomorrow with and If ya in London get yourself there! 
yesss 
the fun police at radio1 will not let us use toasters! LAME! 
that as hilarious! Too many texts coming in on my show! Love you boys! 
down with the crumpets NEXT with the on my show! 
ok get ready for a new game on my show after 11am. This is a classic case of 'name before game' but its turned out pretty well! #radio1 
so good right! 
woop woop 
Im the curator of FESTIFEEL on 4th June :  tickets here:  Â£20! bargain! Good music, good times! 
Who likes rocket ice lolly shirt? im digging it! 
So show britain unzipped is on bbc3 tonight at 9pm. We are having dinner and he wants you to know he didnt ask me to do this 
Pulled apart by horses ROCKING a cover of Blue Jeans LOUD!! #livelounge 
sooo nice 
hahah couldnt wait! 
yaye! The checke one? 
i do my best! xx 
yaye x 
Today pops in to see us, Pulled Apart By Horses are in the Live lounge and Bieber news from Nats at 1215pm. 
Jack White gig was powerful! All girl band looking hot and so musically slick! Mr White you are king! 
The Alt J album is perfection! Me and Rudy the cat are listening to it again! 
Ahhh thank you for the beautifl flowers! lana and pro green is happening ! 
 <3 Lana 
Tom Hiddleston in the studio  
LOVING all your #morningfearne photos! 
Talking of running my dads mate is doing this  amazing! Get sponsoring! 
Good luck to anyone running the marathon today! Especially my mate GOOO GREG!!!! 
Just had dinner with my gorgeous 6 year old god son who taught me quite a lot about Dr Who. He is an expert! 
loved it!!!! xxx 
YUP!!!! <3 
i know i dont know why i said that. It was late last night and my brain was frazzled! EASTEASTEAST 
EXCITING!!! 
errr worth the wait right!! 
good right 
good good 
watch Lana in the live lounge here!  
yaye xx 
thanks babes 
thanks man 
xx 
100% 
wow #lanadelradio1 trending number 1 in the world! 
what a shame you live your life in such a negative way! 
get ready doll! 
ha thanks Mr H! 
The Live lounge on my show TODAY! Radio1 10am! I interviewed her last night and it was lovely. I could have chatted for hours. 
No worries it was lovey meeting her 
dont forget on itv2 tonight at 10pm you lovey lot. 
Just had the most wonderful half hour chat with which you can hear on my show tomorrow. Special lady. 
This weather is YUCK! 
lovely to see you again darling 
A lovely afternoon at the royal marsden hospital! Met lots of lovely people and saw some familiar faces! Lovely to see you all! 
So lovely to meet you at the royal marsden ! 
BOOM! 
got lana in the live lounge tomorrow. Got any Qs for her?? 
awful!! Rain mac back out the cupboard! Miss you when can we hang? 
Will Smith Miami on my show right now! Lets book a flight and go to south beach! 
hahaha 
yup!!! 
good good 
And tonight I met Jet from Gladiators! Childhood dream come true!  
My gorgeous team for celebrity juice this week! See it tomorrow on itv2  
good good 
New Black Keys track on my show next! Radio1 
thanks doll 
pretty good impression right? haha 
Huw's 5 minute Stag Do part III!  
thanks babes 
thanks sorry about the whipped cream! 
lanky git x 
today on my show in the live lounge! Radio1 10am! 
Reading this brilliant book. It's takes you to magical places and induces weird dreams!  
incase you missed this yesterday. Jelly fish, pink sandals and cake  
thanks man 
NEW Nelly Furtado on my show NOW! Radio1! 
I have the first play of the new Nelly Furtado Track on my show today and a chat with her. It's a cracking tune! Radio1 10am 
hello! 
Yes!!!!! 
Just made beetroot and quinoa veggie burgers from scratch. #veggiehippycooking <3 
New blog! Fish with big noses, Lumo shoes and cake!  
thanks for all your lovely photos and #morningfearne texts! 
sweet 
Back on radio1 today. Trying to get back in work mode after a week off. Forgot my bbc pass to get in the building already. Good start. 
What a lovely wedding. Brides dress was awesome, food delish and playlist ace. I do love a good wedding! 
On the way to Sam and Jens wedding. I've got changed 6 times. My boyfriend hates me! Gone for the floral suit. 
On the way to Sam and Jens wedding. I've got changed 6 times. My boyfriend hates me! Gone for the floral suit. 
So far... Frank Sinatra day by day, the rolling stones emotional rescue, cat power, bob Marley, NOW on to Beastie Boys the brouhaha. 
i pod on random shuffle on a long train journey watching the English countryside roll by. Lovely! 
After only a week away I've come back to a blossomed lined street! Beaut!  
Thanks to the lovely air hostess who found my sacred eye mask I had left on the flight! Can't sleep without it! I shall sleep well tonight! 
Exciting! I've heard that Keaton Henson is the special guest at the night at Madame JoJo's in London tonight! 
thanks babes 
Loving work today. Having a right giggle in studio #radio1 
glad to hear it 
thanks for chatting to me whilst chillin in your pants! love the song! x 
NEW track on my show NEXT #radio1 
haha 
thanks man xx 
Nneka Shining star the Joe Goddard remix is still definitely my fave song of the moment! 
you in the office yet? Wanna come try one of cornish's chocolate boobs? 
LL's lounge leggins 
alchoplop doll! classic 
My mother just sent me the weirdest most brilliant text ever. I'll tell you about it on radio in a bit! #radio1 
Peace man!  
Nice muffins!  
Azelia Banks, Foster the people, Duck sauce, Miles Kane and Pulled apart by horses. Just some of the tunes i'll play for you today #radio1 
yes to old school Coldplay on Moyles show! That whole first album makes me weep a bit...in a good way. 
<3 
no worries dude! X 
My dream team for celebrity juice which you can see tomorrow on itv2!  
the best book! Let me know what you think! Xxx 
First celebrity juice was hilarious this afternoon. Head ache from laughing. One down, one to go! 
Bahamas 'caught me thinking' is the perfect summer song! 
For those of you who are listening to my show now. Rose could have so fit Jack on the floating door! Budge up love! 
hahaha 
ha thanks poppet x 
xxxxx 
ah bless ya x 
am i seeing you chaps today?? x 
Morning. Busy one today. Radio 1 then 2 celebrity juices to record. Calculating caffeine intervals. 
dude you see the show on tv yesterday with Noel fielding? Amazing! 
Another very shoot today. This time in a rad old cherry red jag. Lots of make up needed for the old eye bags. 
sending you big cakey hugs angel one xxxxxxxxx 
welcome Danny Howard to the R1 family  
love you darling! How are you doing?? 
haha broadcast critical poo 
Blog time. Painting and the Sonys  
If you missed this in the Times this weekend here is my self portrait for Face Britain. #diamondjubilee  
Lovely pretty B traits  
Lots of fun djing in Guildford last night. Sore feet from dancing and belly from laughing. x 
good luck x 
good good x 
happy birthday x 
Hello lovely ones. Radio1 now for some Friday tunes. 
you do not know me and are obviously a very negative person. Shame. 
oh wow i love this one J!! 
Reading through some of your comments about last nights Juice! Glad to see you enjoyed! Goldie is totally mad! 
Don't forget celebrity juice on in 15 on itv2! 
Ha wishful thinking xx 
espresso martini currently in hand! 
too much fun! J'stine hhaha! #espressomartiniinhand 
why not! Might even have an espresso martini woop! 
Just finished the 3rd day of the very shoot. All got a bit delirious and giggly towards the end. Cheeky cocktail time? 
thanks man 
xxxx 
i dont think you know anything about me thank you very much. You have never met me and have not a clue! Pathetic 
no worries babe 
Wanna come to the pants party? 
I love lamp! LOUD NOISES! 
haha 
happy belated birthday doll! 
Such a funny celebrity juice tonight! See it tomorrow on itv2! Night you lot x 
This is unfortunately in front of me right now!  
sending you oodles of love Lou Lou! Xxxxxxx 
i said CAKE! ahhhhhhh 
wooooooppppsssssssssss (think i just said it by mistake) No one heard that right? 
yaye 
Made a mix tape for the shoot today. Alt j, Jack White, Jake Bugg, Alabama shakes, First aid kit, Nneka. 
straight from radio to another Very photoshoot. Will i ever see this sunshine? Will have fun on the shoot with though. 
yaye cant wait! Wanna come to mine before heading to jakkis? 
yes you coming djing with me?? Kye is down too! 
miss you babs x 
exactly. You are talking utter rubbsh. Goodo. 
please give me examples. I think youll find your telling porkies darlin. 
just played this! Nice... 
oi you! 
on the show today NEW Dot Rotten, a live lounge vote and my BIG THING from Nneka! Radio1 
On a shoot for my new very collection. Black keys Loud on the stereo! 
so good right! 
Chace Crawford in the studio!  
Chace Crawford is a lovely man! Great having him on the show today and he liked my cake! yaye! 
thanks man 
woooop x 
You lot are the BEST! Some genius questions for Mr Crawford! Listen from 10am to see if your Q makes it on the show! 
Chase Crawford will be on my show today on radio1. Listen in from 10am. Any questions for him ? 
tis i! You won the bet? 
Good luck if you're doing your sport relief mile today! 
Lots of people tweeting me about the talking clock. If you call it to check British Summer time hours i might just tell you the time! 
yes nads! 
Heart carrot cake made with love for Reggie for tea tomorrow!  
a nice 7k run in the London sunshine. Perfect way to start the weekend! 
The film about Bernard was so very sad and heart breaking. Let's all donate again and again! Give what you can! 
For those asking the sport relief special is on around midnight ish on bbc one 
Also later a sport relief special! It gets pretty naughty! 
I will be on with at midnight! 
amazing i love you! 
Crying then laughing then crying then laughing. Sport relief. Best night of Telly! 
slightly worried about what Paddy and i have planned for our section of sport relief! its not the norm put it that way! bbc1 tonight! 
no worries babes 
darling ive lost your number so text me! I have a Q for you! xx 
wrong number. DM me or get it off of Jamie! 
oh my god they look amazing! 
runnnn 
Spud awwwwww 
R.I.P Gary the dog #celebrityjuice 
So is a total legend! Get donating then switch over to itv2 for juice! 
If your not watching amazing challenge on bbc1 switch over and watch! Incredible 
good good 
Eastenders vs corrie celebrity juice tonight! Itv2 10pm! Oush! 
yaye 
well done babes 
thanks babes 
Lauren Pope about to run! 
Really enjoyed running my mile on the treadmill this morning. Loads more people running here at radio1 all day!  
watch people running! Paloma Faith currently on the treadmill!  
spring has sprung  
Can not wait to see the sport relief show tonight on bbc1! 
ah thanks dolly! I'll play some nice tunes tomorrow to get ya through work! 
Just finished filming 2 celebrity juices. My face hurts from laughing. You can see it tomorrow on itv2! Now hot choc then bed time! 
In homage to our discussion on radio this morning I just ate a spoonful of peanut butter straight out of the jar! #dirtylittlehabit 
nice one! 
oh god theyre amazing! See you in a bit babes x 
i proper cacked meself! 
Morning! Radio1 now for music, chitter chatter and Katy Perry love. 
yes soon again puuurrrlease! 
My toes look like they belong to a lady at last thanks to a nice stay and pedi at this weekend! 
Madness outside the studio for ! What a lovely live lounge! Thanks Katy.  
Cowabunga 
Ha shall i put a word in for you? ps shwing? are you tweeting from the 80s? 
It'll be live on the radio from 10am and live streamed on the radio1 website from 1145am! 
Today is the big, sweet, candy floss flavoured day! Katy Perry on my show for our live lounge special! woop 
Happy mother's day to all those mum's out there! Especially to Lin Cotton you wonderful, mad, funny mother. 
Well done to Rachel Wood who won my 3 million thank you's competition! Very Clothes on the way! Xx 
Early Mothers day dinner! #mumatron  
Painting, Rudy the cat and nice songs  blog time 
only 30 more minutes and we can pretend none of this ever happened! 
lots of One direction it seems! 
The fire alarm has gone off so we are all stood outside on the street ! Emergency cd playing out ! I'll be back soon! Radio1 
Not long now! in the live lounge on my show on Monday!!! Radio1 10am #liveloungespecial 
got me phone nicked so lost all numbers. Text me ya number mun 
congrats Wendy ! 
yeah classic case of achey face after! Love it x 
you enjoy juice the other night dude? 
ah thanks love! Good to see you!!! Big love xx 
no way! 
oh dear that is very tragic! 
Sat down singing to Adele! #theshame  
For those of you who tweeted me about my jumpsuit on celebrity juice last night it was one of my own from  
For those of you who asked i chose to sing Adele last night ! Adele!! What was i thinking! Who do i think i am? FOOL! 
I'll admit it, i've felt better. 
Ok I've had a gin. Anyway watch celebrity juice tonight at 10pm on itv2 for a good laugh! 
I sang! Oh god! 
Sooo is singing to Busted! 
I am not partaking! The radio1 party! The end!  
allnof it doll it's my Fave bit 
haaaa I forgot about that one! 
ha me too! Not ready til next year though! 
Going through all my new designs for next year with the very team. #fluroflorals  
you guys in blighty watters? 
lovely music from Miike Snow live on radio1 last night  
loving reading all of your Wu Tang names! Hilarious! 
and slip and slide! 
god its just soo good! I want a calippo and flip flops! 
Jazzy Jeff and The Fresh Prince Summertime! Perfection! Radio1 NOW! SO loud in the studio! 
Very much looking forward to The Maccabees in the live lounge at 1140am on my show today! Radio1 
gorgeous to see you last night xx 
Eaten quite a lot of chocolate so could be a hyper celebrity juice. Or may have a sugar crash? 
I KNOW!!! 
ha ive had FURN and Sam on the side before! Nice! 
u go girl 
my NEW summer shoes (and lots of nice dresses etc) are on line now!  
yaye x 
For all of you who were asking me to tweet a photo of the power walking get up! Be warned its not pretty!  
nice tune chaps! 
so good right! 
oh nooooo! 
best film evs! 
This is ridiculously beautiful  
if you missed this yesterday  THANKS! 
Ive reached 3 million followers!  Thanks guys! 
good luck today darlin xxxx 
good luck today darlin xxxx 
Michael Kiwanuka is in the live lounge RIGHT NOW on my show! A total delight. 
so there you have it in the live lounge for our next special on monday the 19th of march!! 
Stepping outside of my baking comfort Zone to make a strawberry cheesecake! #complicated 
If you love music watch my fella's dad's show tonight on sky arts. The Ronnie Wood show at 11pm. Great music and stories. 
Greg and I have the same shirt on today! #ladz  
Earthquake All Stars Remix! ahhh are you wetting yourself? 
Hello Friday. Call a mate and tell them you love them, be nice to others and smile. Thats what Fridays are for! 
get better dude 
bless ya 
pretty lush right 
Today the miu miu boots are out. Friday footwear.  
YES! Cakey coming your way xxxx 
miss youuuuuuuuuuu x 
hahah wobbly chops! 
Yup....there you have it! The radio 1 position! 
Haha Gino is from Sheffield! 
Text swim to 70005 ! you rock! 
Now crying. The big swim is incredible! you are a legend! Im donating again right now! 
how could I forget! 
Loving big swim already! 
See why Gino has ruined my microphone at radio1 for ever on tonight at 10pm 
dangly and pendulous haa 
New Temper Trap! Pretty tasty! 
#Justified 
such a good album! 
thanks babes 
ah sweet! x 
Justin Trousersnake on radio1! Like i love you! TUNE! 
So on tonight's Celebrity Juice you will see Gino ruin my radio1 work environment for ever! itv2 #mentallyscarred 
Bed time. Juice was fun tonight! See it tomorrow on itv2 ouuushhhhhhh 
Ha look at this photo that Keith just showed me! Humpin my leg like a small dog!  
Soda! Do you mean fizzy pop! Come back to England! Miss u 
ha All Stars! 
haaa 
 
My lovely mate is running the half bath for so sponsor him and we'll <3 you 4eva . Details on the way 
yeah sort of! Whats new muffin man? 
if any of you were wondering what SHOGGING (Showbiz/jogging) was earlier... 
oh love the new Heart piece!  
i wish! just half asleep today 
Racing with Hamitons: Nic In the driving seat. A doc following Nic's 1st year as a racing driver with cerebral palsy-BBC One 10.35pm Tuesday 
also watch an amazing tv show my wonderful mate made! Details to follow... 
my dad asked me to play it on radio again today as he loves it so much! ha! 
This is GOOD  
im going to email you now!! 
yes dinner please! What nights you free??? 
i know i cant believe Hales is off today!! BOO! Lucky New York getting her! 
Happy st Piran's Day! Get your Pasties out! 
I have managed to lose my whole make up bag! Help! Most girls worst nightmare! I look like Zelda without my slap! 
If you text a donation this week feel happy/smug that you massively helped a stranger out there who needs it! Love the radio1 listeners! 
Huge congratulations to the amazing for his week of hell for AND WELL DONE radio1 listeners for the cash! 
Baking cakes for mum's charity clothing sale tomorrow. So far a butter free, wholemeal manuka honey loaf! 
The Kiss  
Text sport to 70011 and your Â£1 will help so many people, make John Bishop VERY happy and allows you to be smug all day! 
MJ black or white on Moyles show ! wooo! miss you dude! 
One does protest too much? 
Is it alright if I call you dave? 
Glad your enjoying the show/jedward being pelted with elastic bands/Harry's six pack. Itv2 now! 
miu miu babes 
Nearly time! Get ready to laugh so much your cheeks implode! itv2 10pm 
There's a whole lot of colour going on today. Totally tropical!  
Oi sorry i ignored you by mistake on twitter! AHHH YEAHHH! 
good on you! 
Wolfmother Woman! YESSSSS 
i do try! 
hahah yup! 
thanks man x 
yup for you too doll 
Rufus and i were discussing this tune yesterday! MEMORIES!  TUNE! 
a happy song to start your day!  <3 
I had the Hoff on my team and Holly had and and Freddy Flintoff 
Laughed so much tonight at that my face hurts! see it tomorrow on itv2! Now where's that bed! 
Alabama Shakes. YES!!! 
ive got my own skrillex button like Katie from The Tings TIngs! Woop! I'll play it on my show next! 
text SPORT to 70011 if you havnt already! Feel smug/happy/chuffed that you are helping people who need it and motivating John! 
i always feel bad when calling up John BIshop on the show whilst he is running up a hill/rowing/cycling! Sorry BISH! You can do it! 
Louie Spence  bringing some high kicks to the studio 
ohh treat yourself!! 
well done mate 
thanks dude 
If you missed Dappy and Brian May in the Live lounge yesterday you should check it out  
Tribes album on again! Addicted. 
Painting portraits whilst listening to smashing pumpkins. Content. 
Support and text SPORT to 70011 now! THANKS! 
IS THIS ACTUALLY HAPPENING on my clock! !!! We will Rock YOU with Brian May on my show! Nice one Dappy! 
LIVE LOUNGE TIME radio1 NOWWWWW 
Radio 1 now for a new BIG THING, Oscar news and Dappy and the legend that is Brian May in the live lounge! 
Bret McKenzie's Man or a Muppet won an Oscar! Woooop! Love him and the song a lot! 
That was a euphoric, atmospheric, cracking gig right there! Thank you 
The 'girlband' (one member not so keen)  
Oh dear and i have both turned up to the gig wearing red jeans! #looklikeagirlband 
shogging 
Can not wait! 
haha greg just made me laugh so much doing his showbiz jog around the studio! 
Oh Benjamin Francis Leftwich playing beautiful in the live lounge right now! 
You heard correctly the legend that is Brian May and Dappy in the live lounge monday on my show! radio1 
wow looks so sick dude 
We Were Children. Cant stop listening to this song!  
Morning gang. Benjamin Francis Leftwich in the live lounge today! Radio1 10am 
Hope you enjoyed tonight's celebrity juice! Ps I won't do anything for a Â£ 
Malcolm hahahah 
Yaye x 
Not long til celebrity juice! 10pm itv2! Ouuushhhh! 
my photos of the Brit awards. Blog time  
Thursday! You know what that means don't you? I get verbally abused by a ginger man whilst celebrities play random games! time! 
Just finished filming celebrity juice. A very funny one tonight! So lookin forward to going to bed! Pj time! 
Radio 1 show done. Celebrity juice to go. More coffee? Might be too hyper/shakey/a-general-mess 
Team Brits  
 
Just had a lovely chat with lana del rey. So so happy for her tonight! 
45 minutes of Live Lounges from past Brit winners on my show at 12pm RADIO1 
jump on line to the radio 1 website 
ah thanks doll x 
Best moment ever! Will never forget it! 
Ah watching The diamond Queen and they showed the moment I met the queen. So weird watching it back. What a silly grinning face I had! 
 that link again 
Just got me one of these!  
Yeah love you guys 
Running around town doing voice overs. Should have worn comfy shoes. 
Temperly jump suit doll 
It's Florence!  
no worries guys love your track! 
wooop 
back at radio 1 HQ now. Florence Welsh popping in at 11ish and loads of tunes coming your way! 
Keith, Holly and I are on Jonathan Ross tonight! It's messy and eggy. You'll see why tonight! 
haha 
thanks chick 
BIG shame 
jakey i miss you when we doing that double date? 
no problem x 
happy 21st ! Have a good one! Birthday shots on tuesday night! 
Why is Keith's Adele so ginger ? #celebrityjuice 
oh that sweet of u x 
thanks chick 
ha bless ya 
New celebrity juice on at 10pm! be there x 
Err hello nothing of mine is dropping thanks very much! 
Just finished a very fun photo shoot around London. Cold but happy! Sort of got told off by one of the guards outside buck palace though! 
you must come back on the show Also baking butternut squash white choc cake! #veggietimes 
yes Adam how are you? When are you in the uk next? Ive perfected the beetroot brownie! 
bless ya 
 Sat night 
i love this lady  
Christina RIcci on the show in 30 minutes, Anna Calvi in the live lounge and my BIG thing from Deaf Havana. That's how we are rollin today! 
Jonathan Ross show was so fun. Thanks ! Now wheres that bed? 
Really fun filming celebrity juice tonight! Now we are off to woooop 
xx 
Doll thanks so much!!! Happy Birthday in two days! 
Live Lounge time! Hello 
happiness is in the live lounge today! Radio1 10am 
love you Babs 
xxx 
how lovely of you. I didnt ask for your opinion on my face. What a shame you have such inner anger. 
Remember (on this day of love) if people are negative towards you, they're just exposing the things they deplore most in themselves 
Valentines snogs xx (even if you hate Vallies day just tell someone you love them)  
Yeah and who reminded YOU! 
oh thanks guys! xxxx 
wow thanks guys x 
#HOTCHANGE 
thanks darlin 
So chuffed for Adele last night! Ruling it for us Brits. A good night for British music and a good night for British film at the BAFTAs too! 
thanks doll xxx 
thanks so much doll x 
wow was magical on stage tonight! An incredible BAFTA awards ceremony 
Incase I never get to wear jewels like this again! I probably won't. It's been nice wearing you!  
Thanks for watching on E! We are now marginally warmer and inside! F&D  
Getting ready for the E! BAFTA coverage with 
R.I.P Whitney. Very sad news. 
good luck tomorrow Mr Fry! X 
haha 
tomorrow on E! At 5pm doll 
Just finished rehearsals for the red carpet at the BAFTAs for E! tomorrow! Now need to work out how to conceal thermals under my dress! 
i know i will have blur toes! Avatar stylee! 
best photo ever! Thanks gorgeous god son Bram and lil Gabey 
Off to rehearse for the red carpet coverage of the BAFTAs with Dermot for the E! channel. Its LIVE tomorrow! Hot water bottles at the ready! 
If you are off to see this week im so jealous! They were incredible last night ! GOLD ON THE CEILING! 
YES Ed! Too excited! 
so in case you missed that next week in the live lounge Anna Calvi, Emile Sande and the Vaccines! 
its gonna be GOOD! 
sorry i missed your call yesterday ill call you after work today! miss you SC!!! 
good to see you doll 
ACNE nice wasnt it! 
thanks and you x 
the best Babs xx 
Thanks for watching Celebrity Juice last night too! How funny was 
Black Keys and Band of Skulls were beyond brilliant last night! So GOOD to see there and have a dance! Love ya gurl! 
So excited about and the black keys tonight! and get ready to dance! 
no worries good tune! x 
ha thanks man 
 Inspiration 
 Inspiration 
GOLD ON THE CEILING! wooop 
ha sorry raymondo x 
ps those shoes werent on a table. Just a small ledge thing at the celebrity juice studios for the superstitious amongst you tweeting me! 
wash it down with some of the green stuff and it wont count!! <3 
Obsessed with these! They're a bit Queen Elizabeth vs ziggy stardust  
there's cake in the kitchen for you! 
thanks doll! 
That was a fun first show! See take part in quite an unusual game on celebrity juice tomorrow! 
Just about to go record the first celebrity juice of series 7! Ouuushhhhh 
Juice time  
 juice time 
At the moment my style inspiration is 100% Margot Tenenbaum from the Royal Tenenbaums 
Did NOT expect this ! band of skulls covering Example! 
NEXT on the show in the live lounge! #happy 
so jeallllll love you x 
yaye see you in a bit Can you bring some eyes with you i seem to have left mine in my bed. 
Today Band of Skulls on my show in the Live lounge! If youve not heard this band live get ready for general LOUDNESS and excellence! radio1 
if you missed this yesterday check it out! Maverick Sabre covering Lana Del Rey!  
wow that is awesome and weird!! 
Party bags on fire, drawing clothes and losing a million pounds  
The clear divide between my desk and devs! #devcleanyourmessup  
THANK YOU what a wonderful live lounge! 
watched The Ides of March the other night! Great film. Prepping for The BAFTAs red carpet that im presenting with for E! 
Maverick Sabre in the live lounge today! 1140am radio1 
The diamond Queen on bbc One! Loving every second! 
#dontriskyourrep 
nice one! Keep it up love! 
thanks man 
radio1 10am. Todays show will be fuelled by cake! I have baked cupcakes and we just got sent 2 boxes. #Sugarhighs 
Sketching sound track The Tribes album! Superb! 
Getting my sketch on for my very spring summer collection 2013  
it's a Neil young song 
A party bag just set on fire. One reveller attempted putting it out in alcohol! Not the best idea! 
Playing pass the parcel at my mate Lucy's 30th! So far brother has won a hair mask! Amazing! 
Dropped my eyebrow pencil down the back of the radiator. I may look like I haven't got eyebrows for a while. 
good for u babes x 
That was utterly horrible. Never been so scared/ gutted! Spread the love and make us feel better! 
Yaye 
Cycling through the highlands, getting my BCG, wearing a swimming costume live on tv... 
Million pound drop. So scared. Things I have dreaded less. My driving test, a 4 hour tattoo session, getting GCSE results... 
beautiful cover!! 
After moaning about being chilly this cab driver just said to me "cold is only a sensation" yeah I know that, it's just not a very nice one 
haaa 
happy birthday 
Well ive never played Las Ketchup on the radio before! 
Who else in contemplating the revival of an 80s legwarmer in this cold snap? 
no darlin? have you got the right email? Ill DM you 
Annie Mac with Fearne  
hope youve got your thermals on doll! 
wish i had brought a hot water bottle to work today. 
woop 
at 1140 on my show is in the live lounge! Radio1 
sending love/hugs/snogs/ to you darling one xxxxxxxxx 
Miike Snow is my BIG THING this week and my gosh its BIG! 
lovsd it! I want all their clothes! Another woody classic 
So cute! (shouts) "HELLO MUMMY " down phone! 
you sad individual. 
Chai cupcakes freshly made this morning!  
This is an old painting of mine of Vivienne Westwood  
love you back ladyyyyy 
THE BEST!!! 
Finished my painting of my mate Amanda.  
The E! Barbie  
Just been given a limited edition E red carpet Barbie! Yessss 
Ha I meant 'driving'! Definitely not 'diving'down it! Wouldn't wanna be in a swimming costume in this temperature! 
In a cab diving down the mall with beautiful blue skies Buckingham palace looks delightful. 
Off to shoot a BAFTA advert with for E! 
About to do a web chat on the  Facebook page! Come ask a question x 
i shall never reveal the babs story publicly as you have too much dirt on me! 
ha 
its our little secret babs! 
Your boss ! BRILLIANT! 
hahaha LOVE IT 
lovely Felicity Jones  
 come say hi laters 
thanks you wonderful man 
any alcohol i may have drunk last night was definitely just sweated out in Bikram Yoga. lush! 
thanks doll 
congrats on your NTA you legend! 
Brother thank you love you x 
thanks guys! 
 NTA fun, frocks and facebook 
correct thanks doll 
thanks doll 
thanks babes xx 
i did try and tell you Gemface! haha 
shall we call you in an ad break?? 
i cant believe i didnt see you! 
oh god. Im imagining straight from Ants kitchen! Changed ya undercrackers? 
yes i knew it! Have you even made it home? Are you still in your frock? 
Im at radio. Not drunk, not even hung over. Had a lovely night but was in bed with a bowl of cereal by 1am! #loser/granny 
thanks doll 
Nostrils  
Celebratory bubbles  
In total shock! Thank you thank you if you voted for us! 
Found some smints in the cab so rationing those out. Traffic is horrendous 
On the way to the NTAs with we are hungry already. Should have packed some car snacks #suchagranny 
ahhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhh I bet you look good on the dance floor!!!!!!! 
yes Katy B cover! Did not see this coming! Sounds bloomin great! 
I love my job a lot today! Alex Turners voice wafting around my studio! The Arctic Monkeys in the live lounge! 
In 40 minutes the will be in the live lounge! radio1 
yaye 
happy birthday lady face 
im jealous and craving adventure! Ive got to do it one day! Email me your gossip x 
good babes how are you? Still away? 
no way I better tell 
My boyfriend wants Ryan's scorpion jacket from Drive! It needed a trip to the dry cleaners If you ask me! 
Also loved Carey Mulligans hair in Drive #thingschickssay 
yes 1140 am radio1 
Watched Drive last night. Had to watch violent bits through hands over my eyes. Genius film though! 
not joking! 
welcome along 
ta babes 
Derm 'n Fearne  
no! 
Bad weather, terrible traffic. Good music and my guest today needed! radio 1 10am 
good luck doll x 
After a hard days lying around...  
Bikram yoga I love/hate you. That was a nice class with we are sweaty sista's 
no worries we had a lovely day! 
radio 1 10am music, chat and a new BIG THING this week. 
Mum doing her hair in one of the beautiful antique mirrors haha  
Me and mother mooching about an art museum. Bliss in here  
Off to look at some art with ma and better put some makeup on before mum has a rant! 
 
The iron lady is phenomenal. Meryl is sublime. 
me and The Ting Tings  
happy birthday Captain! xx 
Got a sneaky early copy of the new shins album. God I love this band! 
My mate Becky's nan knitted this for me!  
feels SO good to be painting again! 
oh god Greg in leggins is beyond disturbing! 
me and Pulled Apart By Horses  
Feel like ive borrowed my Nan Ruby's back for the day after Bikram last night. 
happy birthday Jam xx 
yaye 
have a good one my darlin xxxxxxxxxxxxxx 
ahhh 
Most gross weather in London today. Warning do not wear suede shoes and take a brolly! 
Dude that is so rad 
first Bikram yoga class in 6 months. That was not easy! Me and were sweating like no ones business. BEETROOT face! 
good luck captain! 
Me and Marina  <3 that girl! 
heres that link again woops  
its still ok to... 
ah thanks babes 
Marina and the Diamonds popping in to the studio to say hi in a moment. Radio1 
thanks dude 
treat yourself doll! 
lovely guy right! 
wooop 
thanks man 
The Big Pink are on my show today in the Live Lounge! 10am Radio1 
Don't forget to vote got celebrity juice  
yaye xxxxx 
just about stopped laughing. Phew 
yes dude 
haaaa Scream and Bender haaa! Woops sorry chaps! On air mouth typo! 
Fearne and her Dutch slippers  
Love my new Clog slippers! Thanks Huw Stephens 
ITS the bomb! 
yaye perfection!! How are you chops? I misssss you 
Such fun! Sunday club! 
left over weekend baking headed to Radio1 for my team. get ready for some maple apple bake! 
Me and Keloy are reclining after a manic Sunday of visitors.  
Bread. Ah! Not done this before. Ok give me a week! 
thanks Mr Hollywood! 
ha defo no sOggy bottoms here 
yum! 
Just made an apple maple tray bake from Mary Berrys book! Would would Paul and Mary think?  
Just made cupcakes from the Lola cupcake book! yum!  
Just saw Puss In Boots. A cat with a Spanish accent and a talking egg in a gold PVC onsie=hilare! 
she was actually angry with me 
i just opened the link I loveeeee it! Yes! 
hey dude can't open the link ? 
THEN went in to a full on rant about how its OUTRAGEOUS that women dont bother with make up at all times! 
TO add to this when mum opened the door she said "OH GOD put some makeup on PLEASE" 
so good to bump into today! Looking ultra glam even when chillin. I felt even more scruffy than i already did. 
Nice afternoon lunching and shopping with mother! Got some ace second hand books and baking ingredients for tomorrow! 
Thanks for listening to the show today. Now go have a nice weekend you lot! BIG love 
no worries guys! Thanks again for the live lounge this week! 
yes get ready for apple tray bake lady face 
cheesey pockets! 
ah bless ya 
love you babs xx 
back at you currie head cant wait to hang tuesday xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx 
The best! PLAY LOUD! <3 
good good 
thanks babes 
so good to play Fatboy Slim Praise you on the wireless this morning 
god you are posh! 
Just heard the new track from The Shins. God ive missed them! Its a beaut! 
sick! Looks beaut ! 
Just dragged myself to the gym after the shoot! Now slumped on the sofa waiting for great British bake off! dreaming of cake! 
On another very shoot today for my summer range. Listening to El Camino loudly! 
theyre playing with lana soon shall we have a night out? 
new friends of the show show doing a fine job in the live lounge today! Thanks fellas! 
thanks doll x 
Twin Atlantic in the live lounge on my show today at 11:40am #Radio1 
the cake bit i will happily help you with darlin 
A lovely evening at Downing street to celebrate the huge amount of cash raised for children in need! 
 
yes to those leggins where are they from? 
LOVE bruises. My BIG THING this week! 
thanks doll x 
actually i draw it all out myself! Dont judge before you know the facts dude 
thanks babes 
NEW clothes from my range online. Spring summer <3  
such a laugh co hosting with last night. Hope you enjoyed. Go listen again if you missed it! 
Hear some of my favourite rock tunes on Dan P Carters show tonight at midnight. Radio1 
Just seen samples of my BOOTS make up and toiletries range for THIS year. Dancing round the kitchen with joy. So chuffed with them! 
BEST BAND to have walked the planet 
led zepppelin Whole lotta love on my show NOW!!! All 5:33 minutes of it! 
My first blog of 2012  
thanks doll 
so good thanks. HOw long you in london for? 
please tell me your still in blighty?? 
My BIG thing this week...Band of Skulls Bruises. A total TUNE! 
love you llama chops 
hey babes. I back on radio help no idea what im doing. 
back on radio1 NOW. 
dude it was insane! Will email you now man! Big love x 
First 5k run in two weeks. That was not necessarily fun. Now recovery whilst listening to Black Keys. 
Home from Sri Lanka. Did a pretty good job of having an internet/phone free holiday! How do i work this thing again? 
My first tweet of 2012. Hope your all having a great year so far! 
Just opened my gift from a jelly mold in the shape of a balloon poodle and jelly! Love ya gurl x 
in the griddle pan? Genius! I burnt the underside a bit so yet to perfect them! 
Preparing for family invasion part2. Left overs it is. 
Attempting to cook the boyfriend Jamie Oliver's Christmas waffles with chocolate! Griddles at the ready! Let's go! 
wooop 
defo darlin thanks for my amazin candles love ya 
haaaa 
whistles doll 
Ah bless ya 
ta 
bless ya 
wonderful 
woooohoooo 
wooop 
ah brilliant doll 
lovelyyy 
cuteeee 
yaye 
Don't forget find out who is christmas number 1 by watching top of the pops with me and at 2pm bbc ONE 
Merry crimbo you lovely lot! 
wooop! 
so sweet of you! 
yayeeee x 
a mug of gin! SHAME 
you in the gym you git! 
wooop 
haaaaaa 
love you BAPS 
i love you so much byram! 
rRght radio1 10am. GOOD live music from yesterdays party and gossips. 
i would say we are at about an 8. Coping thus far. Lots f music on my show today! THANKS for popping in gorgeous x 
its all about the cha cha cha ching cha ching 
Oi check the chunky knit! Love u boys x  
... singing Price tag on repeat all night, and writing on my cosmic order black board. 
funny happenings from last nights party. Ollie Locke being in my house, dropping her phone down the loo, 
house=tip 
THANKS for my book doll! and thanks so much for making Silent Night sound more than amazing! Merry crimbo xx 
Had such good fun on the show today! Thanks if you listened! Don't forget celebrity juice christmas special tonight! 
merry christmas from and and me  
Ben howard currently rehearsing in the kitchen. Amazing! 
Me and mum getting ready for the party!  
haha! 
hah fact! 
An exciting day! The big party at mine on radio1 from 10am and then Celebrity Juice CRIMBO special back on your tv's TONIGHT! 
Early morning pre party panic. NO plastic cups and certainly not enough glass ones to go round. 1 text to mother and she saves the day 
Ben howard, rizzle kicks, pro green, mcfly, gok, blackout, chase n status, noah and the whale and kasabian all comin! #housenotbigenough 
Stereophonics and Swan were great tonight. Quite nervous about tomorrows party now! Radio1 10am tomorrow!! 
Watching play with Swan at Shepherds bush empire. Wooop! 
Pinkness  
I'm pink again. Pink for christmas. 
Pink 
thanks doll 
KASABIAN added to tomorrow's party line up! Big fat WOOOOOp Radio 1 
Massive news coming up on the show at 11am TODAY as to who will be at my Christmas party on radio1 tomorrow 
yayeeee i can not wait to see you! 
oh so jeallllllllllllll 
Walking to work in london feels positively tropical compared to the Swiss weather I've been out in this week #gotasweaton 
Been verified at last! woop! 
you didn't make it back to Blighty??? 
Traffic getting home is so bad. Still in a taxi. Been travelling since 10am. Nearlyyyyy there! Bog off traffic!!! 
Yes at LAST ! 
Ps I'm back on radio1 tomorrow at 10am with some pretty ridiculous skiing stories! #notanatural 
3 days til I'm on mums sofa, wearing pjs, getting ploughed with cups of tea every 10 minutes! Can't wait! #festivefamilyfun 
Just landed from Switzerland where I've been filming. Randomly is also on this flight! #bigdawg 
Flying over London at night is beaut. Winter wonderland looked so bright and crazy from the sky! 
Oh god a Christmas Celine Dion cd is now blaring out in the breakfast room of the hotel. 
correct! I'm really going for it out here! 
so true! 
This is the time of year where putting an inch of chocolate spread on toast is totally acceptable. 
Yesterday I got to go in a helicopter for the first time as we filmed a scene up in the mountains! Magical experience! 
Look at this gorgeous fella!  
 want a little Christmas gift? 
no worries lady! Huge love x 
of course! Merry crimbo guys x 
she really is! 
back wednesday doll 
darlin I'm there 5 days a week all year and am off today because I'm working on a tv project. 
Just told mum that Chase N Status are gonna be at the xmas party on thursday and she is over the moon! On air crimbo party Thursday radio1! 
Still filming abroad so gorgeous Coxie will be on radio 1 for me today and tomorrow. 
Not the best at skiing! Apres ski I can handle just fine! â˜ƒ 
Snow!  
One week of work left. The countdown to sitting on mums sofa with a bottle of sloe gin has begun! 
thanks annie ahhhh! 
help jill seriously help 
your very optimistic 
yes soooo excited to seeeee you llama chops 
Tomorrow I will ski for the first time ever. This will unfortunately be documented on camera. #definitelygonnaberubbish 
u guys stay late? So good to see you gorgeous two! 
Thanks angel! merry christmas x 
ah nice good luck! 
Had a great night at Smashing Blouse last night. NATW djing and Under the Driftwood tree were wicked live! 
Early start. Off for more mystery filming. Coffee, lets do this! 
A spanish lady just said I look like Dakota Fanning! #win isn't she like 16 to my 30 years! I like this spanish woman! 
so cuteeeee 
ha classic!!! 
yes aka Babs aka Baps 
Slightly snowing outside radio1 in London town. looking out the window like he has never seen snow before! 
thanks man 
1140am x 
really looking forward to in the live lounge today! radio1 
LOVE having my best mates in studio! LOVE my girls 
Bring Your Friends To Work Day!  
when will i see youuuuuu 
Bring your best mates to work day. My 5 bezzies ive known since i was 5 are on my show today. radio1 
The Black Keys new album El Camino =perfection! 
thanks babes 
hahahaha 
My JLS PJs  and floor-drobe 
its gonna be so fun 
oh nooo poor alls! Cant wait to see youuuuu 
how are you cornholio?? 
As promised earlier on my show here I am in my pj's JLS sent me!  
So it'll be the usual anti climax for my friends and fam when they receive gifts that look like they've been wrapped by a 4 year old again! 
So nice to just bump into Apparently brown paper and red check ribbon is the thing to do wrapping wise this year. 
percy pigs and friends? The sheep are rather good! 
nice one dad! X 
very ungrateful 
HELLO AGAIN 
I soooo agree dude! Ahh the good old days! 
Top if the Pops was a lot of fun last night. Itll be on BBC ONE on xmas day! Im back on radio 1 today. 10am for music and chat! 
yesterday's blog i forgot to tweet. All things that glitter.  
Bed. Hello bed. Still hyper from top of the pops. #needtochillout 
Just finished recording xmas top of the pops! Fake snow, good music and a dancing audience #crimbotime 
Top of the Pops rehearsals done. Looking forward to the show tonight! #crimbotime 
Morning. Im recording Christmas Top of the Pops today so not on radio1. Coxie is kindly doing my show and im back tomorrow. 
from spirithood! 
Fun filming with for the Keith Lemon movie in Belfast. Back to london now for dinner with my boyf. #bangtidy 
vern where are you? Me and Holly are here! 
ha nooo way! 
Yes jeal! We are listening to christmas songs in the trailer still x 
yes I need to make you a pink cake soon! (Yawwwwn) xx 
Up early to go on set for the Keith Lemon movie. Coffee needed. Have a good sunday you lot! 
its getting out of hand. Holly willabuble! 
I'm watching X factor for the first time this series. In Belfast with X factors biggest fan Holly! 
thanks babes 
Off to film with and for the Keith Lemon movie. Reunion! 
Mum was a legend helping me christmas shopping. Got a lot done. She is assertive when shopping where as I am very indecisive. 
yes you are correct! Miriah is factually the best christmas song ever 
lovely first track from the lads! Next up the cover 
JLS in the live lounge NOW on my show radio1 
Elf breaks door  am still laughing/crying 
guys im not in great shape! SO worth it though! Chocolate coins have already been eaten and its not even 10am 
radio 1. On my show today from 10am more Buble ( you can never have too much), vending machine game and JLS in the live lounge! 
sweet! Converted r1 fan! 
did you miss this yesterday?  We <3 the Buble 
Me and my best mates out for our xmas dinner. Been friends since we were 5 years old. #lovemygirls  
ah thanks babes 
I love Michael Buble. What a live lounge, what a guy!! 
Hahahahah cornish In his elf get up  
The christmas jumper of joy! #allinthenameofbuble  
Just witnessed someone getting caught red handed daring to buy a cup of tea at maida vale at 9:10! The rules state it doesn't open til 9:15! 
I bet you are! Heehee 
not sure this is acceptable morning behaviour? 
if you havnt yet seen the radio 1 big weekend film GO ONLINE now  and check it! Wonderful stuff! 
wearing my Christmas jumper already for today's Live Lounge with Michael Buble! radio1 
Off to bed now. Tallulah and I need our kip before Buble day tomorrow on my show! #radio1 night!  
thanks doll 
Nice sneaky listen to the new Band Of Skulls album! Class! 
soooo ridiculously impressed with THIS LOT  
Haha 
yaye i found you welcome to twitter butthead! 
radio1 NOW! Songs, chatter, more songs, christmas fun, popping in and more songs. 
hey babes didnt get your email?? Did you email my new one! 
In early pre recording some christmas fun. Festive times in studio! 
Lovely dinner at Nans with my cuz Katie Cotton. Its all about family and laughing. #goodtimes 
yessssssss rawwkk 
thanks babes 
They are #cherishyourgrandparents 
ooooh exciting!!!! 
Off to see Nan Ruby Cotton. Legend of a woman. 89 and still rockin! 
Yes ill bake you what ever you like! 
thanks babes 
listening back to some of the best live lounges of 2011. We have been so lucky! So many amazing bands/artists have been in 
in studio pre recordning christmas stuff. Eyes not open yet but i seem to be talking. 
thankssss 
Just made a fruit cake. House smelling lush. Christmas tunes playing in the kitchen. Cups of tea with 
Keith Lemon, mother dearest and make up chit chat  
yaye 
ah thanks babes 
Corndog decorates the studio  
Photos,The Queen and live lounge news!  
I will be playing Christmas songs on my show today! Including some festive live lounges! #wishicoulddrinkmulledwine@work 
Juicy  
oh its the best! 
have fun doll x 
me!!! 
Have had a lovely weekend in Dublin watching dvds by the fire, eating home cooked food and sleeping a lot. #feelingfestive 
Pearl Jam dvd and a pint of tea. Bliss. 
thanks doll 
gorgeous! 
Lana Del Rey WORLD exclusive on my show just before 12pm #radio1 
ah thanks babes 
 
its a goodun right! 
yes! Would love that hun! Thank you â™¥ 
This happens every time I try and read a magazine!  
nooo! Ill check with the office but nothing I know of??? 
thanks luv x 
thanks babes 
Thanks doll! Hope your well! X 
Today's nails. Silver reverse manicure.  
Just had such a nice time meeting people in BOOTS westfield! Thanks if you came down to say hi or bought my make up! 
Im off to BOOTS in Westfield at 4pm to talk about my make up range! Pop along if your near by! 
Woop might have just got an early copy of the Maccabees new album. 
lush to see you mr mills. That tan is golden!! xxx 
yaye i love it babes THANKS so much! 
i so want the monkey but know my cats would go mental! 
ahhh so cute!!! 
Just finished filming a new Radio1 advert! You'll see it on tv soon! 
more to the point when is our SPANISH reunion? Olivos! 
aah thanks babes 
yes babes lovely! thanks so much! have a look and see if like any of my new stuff and ill get it over to you xx 
so excited to get proper Christmassy when the one and only is in the Live Lounge next thursday! #radio1 
nice bit of over taking work there father! 
oh yes! Love it!! How are you pops? x 
sooo good right! 
 make up make up 
ha good gift! 
ah nice present! 
ah good good! 
Foster the People in the live lounge on my show at 11:40am #radio1 
happy birthday Stevie chops!!!! 
Yes so lovely to see you lady! 
What a night! can't digest what just happened! #royalfreakout 
Next stop The MacMillan Cancer support birthday gala evening to hand out a very important award! 
Prince William is still a radio 1 listener which is good news. He has asked for a shout out tomorrow. I think I can manage that! 
Most surreal night of my life. As well as meeting the Queen I met Prince Charles and chatted to William and Katherine. 
What an evening! Phillip and I just met the Queen! I'm still in shock  
Off to Buckingham Palace. Excited/nervous/cantbelieveit! 
Im a barbie girl  
so jeal Dan! 
yes desperate to! They are working on dates now! 
owww! Your own stunts! Your not remaking Die hard are you? 
yaye 
Florence <3  
whatttt song? 
Jamie has forbidden me to tweet a photo but I must point out he is also growing a huge tash for movember! A banana with a tash! 
Mum has just suggested my brother added a black belt to his banana outfit to customise it! Oh god!! 
Jamie my brother has just come into the kitchen dressed as a banana! I can't breath! Laughing too much! 
Haha dad is going to the B themed party as big ears and mum has actually used sellotape to stick the ears to his head! I'm creased up! 
So much makeup on. These eye lashes are weighing my eye lids down.  
Barbie time!! Thanks for doing my hair (wig)  
Strangely in the book there is a character Biba (my cuz's name) a Linda (my mums name) a Karen (my aunty) and a Sylvia (my nan) Freaky!!! 
Just finished reading The Poison Tree by Erin Kelly! Bloody great book! 
Just watched an online tutorial to apply Barbie makeup for tonight's B themed party! 
ha im 30 doll! 
WOW ive just had a good look at some of the people that have entered my make up competition on my FB! AMAZINGGGG!  
Happy Birthday to my wonderful lil bro Jamie Cotton! 27 today!!!! 
yesssss at last!!! 
good right! 
Have a lovely weekend you lot! 
Just test drove a Range Rover Evoque. Very fun to drive. I feel like a grown up in it! #foreverateenager 
The mighty Florence!  
Florence and the Machine in the live lounge for our special was indeed...SPECIAL! A magical musical moment! 
There is definitely a harp for today's live lounge. #liveloungespecial  
Its Friday anddddd Florence and the Machine live lounge special time! 10am radio1 
were on stage luvy? Also I must come see your show! Ahhh! Next week? 
yup I'm well up for this! La bacon was on top form last night! 
never!! Cocktails and good chats is what its all about! brunch/lunch/more cocktails soon! 
Lovely to see you last night sore head?? 
Now Emile Sande being brilliant. A wonderful night of live music!  
Ben howard being generally brilliant!  
Off to see live! Can't wait! Hold your head up keep your heart strong! 
Writing an interview for Florence and the Machine for tomorrows Live Lounge Special. V excited! Any burning questions you lot? 
Seeing samples for my Very collection for aut/wint 2012. So exciting. 
ps playing Frank Turner at the end of my show today!! 
trying to sort out dates to do it! Nandos soon?? 
i know. I am a true diva. six is not nearly enough either! 
so good right! I have never been so scared at work before! #beefybodyguards 
hound i miss you how are you? Whats new?? 
hello! 
on nails babe 
 woops here's the link 
Make up competition time. Who wants some treats???... 
Getting my sketch pad up to scratch for my meeting with the very team tomorrow. It looks like art attack in my kitchen. 
Yaye thanks doll 
ah yes! WEll i gave you the warning!!! Never gossip at a tennis match! 
LOVE my new jumper and dress!!! THANK YOU 
ahhh so you liked it!! 
woops heehee 
haaaaaaaaa 
haaaaaaaaa 
haha had the giggles so bad!! 
ah yaye 
congrats babes!!!! 
A lot of people on the web chat asking about what pink lippie I wear. Its my gloss for your info.  
Some great questions being thrown at me on the web chat! 
yaye! 
ah sorry. Ill look out for u! 
come say hi!! 
I have a make up range at Boots ha 
Have I answered your Q doll? 
Or go through officialfearnecotton.com to web chat away 
The web chat has begun! Boots.com let's go! 
ha about what?? 
Hey I'm about to do a make up web chat go to boots.com to say hi and ask anything you like!! (With in reason) 
ha #BENTON is trending number 1 in the world! I love my listeners! 
always sugar!! xxxxxxx 
no you wont!!! You are a prince and deserve the best, hottest piece of crumpet out there! 
#BENTON 
this made me cry with laughter this morning!  
Nails today!  
haha! It was pretty funny! 
My boyfriend just had a stare off with the cat and was over the moon to win. 
 TOMORROW 
lovely to see you babes! now book that trip to Hawaii !! <3 
Fearne and Kelly  
actually had an amazing chat about new music! Will never forget it! 
you know what i think it was better!! 
OK i still can not believe that just happened. John flippin Cleese. I think i might have even been a bit 'coy' and im rarely coy! 
Just met John Cleese. I went burning red and stuttered a lot. That was up there with meeting Jimmy Page. #overthemoon 
If I had known before I got in the car I would have brought my VHS box set! #cleeselove 
MORNING! my new website is up and running! woop  
it was on channel 4 saz!!!! 
Grease is on tv! Why did no one tell me!! Woop (slips on pink jacket and dances around the lounge) 
wink all the way! Love ya 
yaye 
Of course!! 
Lovely to see my gorgeous friend who just popped in for a cuppa. 
"Keep your head, keep your heart strong". Singing this song loud in the kitchen whilst drawing! 
Lovely brunch with the Cottons. Nan Ruby Cotton was dressed superbly in purple with matching hair! Love it! 
Off to the Cottons for my cousins birthday brunch. 
thanks man 
For anyone who missed the end of the show at 2am the total was over 26 mil and still growing! Amazing! 
mulberry doll 
Still slightly delirious from last night! What an amazing night! Thanks if you donated! Big love x #CIN 
bless ya doll 
I shall go to sleep happy. Working with Sir Terry was a dream as per usual and many kids here in the UK will be helped. Well done you lot! 
Bless ya man 
Record breaking Children in Need total! Everyone here more than chuffed! Thank you if you donated! What a night! 
Yaye goooo Gok!!!!! Razzle Dazzle! 
Very gold! Watch, sing, dance, and donate tonight. Children in Need on BBC1 730pm tonight!  
I'm wearing a very gold dress tonight! 
Looking forward to tonight. I'm on with Sir Terry from 1030 ish tonight! I'm now off to hunt down Gok at TVC! 
Me, Mr M and the lovely David Tennant singing 'back for good'!  
Keep texting donate to 70705 it would be amazing to get the BIGGEST ever total tomorrow on CIN night! Sir Terry will be over the moon. 
Did I just tweet a fake gazza? Woops. YOU ARE THE MAN x 
What a night! Thanks for watching, thanks for donating #CINrocks you are THE MAN! 
First Gaga sighting of the day. I got asked to move out of the way so she could walk passed. Hilarious. She looked amazing though! 
Coldplay are sound checking! I can hear from my dressing room. It sounds delightful! 
thanks man 
its gonna be gooood!! 
Not long now until BBC Children in Need Rocks in Manchester! 8pm BBC1 and BBC radio1 
Look what I have a copy of!!! You can get one too soon!  
Just met up for lunch with one of my co presenters for the day, Mr David Tennant. #CINrocks 
Anyway who cares about sleep! Today is Children in Need rocks day! Woop! 
Also let's just say drinking a coffee at 11pm last night before my dj set was a bad idea. #notmuchkip 
Off to the MEN for my radio show live from Manchester. Jessie J and James Morrison on the show. Radio1 10am! 
Was sat on a dream of a table with my fella, sir Terry, Gary and Jason Donovan. I'm a lucky lady! So much money raised too! #brillnight 
What a wonderful night. Gary's gala for Children in Need was brilliant. Had a blast djing! Finished with 'relight my fire'! Standard! 
I knew it! Biatch!! Xxxx 
If you havnt already throw a happy birthday! 
Ha Sinead caught Red handed! That is my bracelet!!!!!! Tell her that is classic Alex! She'll know what I mean! 
Why on a train journey can I not stop eating. Just polished off my boyfriends Pretzels (that sounds rude..I mean it literally) 
hope you enjoy the night doll. Get well soon 
god I always do that! I am heavily uneducated remember. #andyourstillannoying 
you've only been back in the country 3 days and already your becoming an annoyance! 
watch it James!!! 
xx 
Ah thanks man 
Its gonna be a great night! 
Off to manchester after radio for a couple of mad Children in Need packed days! Then back to London for the big night Friday! 
not even sure what I'm wearing yet ahh! 
ahh glad you like them doll 
Drawing out some ideas for my very range unbelievably for Christmas 2012! 
Just had a meeting with sir Terry Wogan. The excitement of working with him never dulls. Legend! 
Thanks love 
Off for a script meeting about Children in Need on Friday. 
ah so cute thanks xxx 
superrrrrrrbad its going to blow your mind! 
yaye see you then cuz x 
Happy birthday to my lovely cousins and his twin Katie x x X x 
you can do it gurlll 
who hides in the bakery at xmas? ...mince spies 
Ps I know I look about 14 in that photo. I've not put me face on today! #mustputmascaraon 
Look who is back! Yaye!  
beautiful sounds coming from the live lounge right now! Thank you Snow Patrol! 
Snow Patrol NEXT in the live lounge!! radio1 
BIG Florence and the Machine news on my show next! 
Snow Patrol in the live lounge today! radio 1 10am gang! 
ohhh lucky! X 
oh nooo 
Today's weather in London can be described in one word. RANK 
Ha no chance. in the jungle there is a distinct lack of gin and cake and far too much kangaroo bollock and rat 
I'm a celebrity get me out of here! Goooo Dougie! 
straight up out the jar sista! 
I think foot massages are one of the best things ever. Just above peanut butter, the smell of bread and fresh bed sheets. 
Ah Sunday. Lovely lazy Sunday! You are by far the most glorious lazy day. 
hey guys x 
thanks doll 
Good luck with your big clothes sale for charity today! 
thanks man! 
At the cinema. In fear I'm gonna fall asleep. Heavy old eye lids. As long as I don't do any snoring/sleep talking! 
thanks hun 
Had a right cry when all the kids played music for me. Such talented kids with such a connection musically. 
Just visited the most incredible music centre for kids with special need conditions funded by A beaut of an afternoon 
And another...  
Have become slightly obsessed with mini woolly hats you get with smoothies for Help the Aged!  
SO excited to see this darlin!! 
in 10 minutes stop what your doing and send your thanks. #armisticeday 
11.11.11 stop at 11am today and give thanks to those who have fought for us before and the troops and their families today. 
oh no what have i started! 
Is it Friday?? Yes? Yessss it is! My first full weekend off in a while. From 5pm today i shall have my feet up and slippers on. 
have the best time!!! Please go to Harry Potter world!!! xxxx 
Celebrity juice on itv2 at 10pm don't forget! Ouuushh! 
 Nails, Ibiza and me and Greg singing badly to Coldplay! 
they're from my range at boots! 
good luck coxie! Sending love and hugs x. X 
No worries guys 
No worries guys had the loveliest afternoon 
Just had a lovely visit to the Met some amazing kids today. Made christmas cards and baubles too! 
Lovely to meet you hannah! xxx 
off to the to meet the gang down there today! Looking forward to seeing you guys! 
thanks guys xxxx 
Sunless 97 Illuminations...a heavenly track!!! 
lets get a date in the diary so i can bake for you!!! 
Morning! Loick Essien in the Live Lounge today! 
hey nearly birthday gurrrlll love ya!!! 
 
Silver nails today from the night nails set from my range at BOOTS. 
Noooo not the baby penguin. I can't take any more! 
I know so sad 
Has any one else welled up tonight during Planet Earth? The baby seals, the music, the penguins surfing! I'm a wreck! 
Ha planet woops! Typing with one hand as Keloy ( the cat) is sat on the other 
Look who else is enjoying Frozen Plant  
Cup of tea, frozen planet. Heavenly! 
Dan P Carter brings cakes  ROCKKKK 
heehee! 
hahah 
thanks love 
xxx 
thanks man x 
cheers mate! NO cake for you 
i do try xx 
yayeee 
Labrinth and bit of vintage Arctic Monkeys to start our wednesday! Lovely jubbly 
I'm going mad! I rush tweeted earlier and posted the photo of the zebra nails and stated they were leopard! Over tired mess of a brain 
Leopard nails tonight!  
i love you niheezy! you know why!!! 
Ronnies got one tonight dude. COme along if you fancy before the gig ? 
cant dude got an art exhibition to go to! JEAL!! I'll see if i can get there after for a bit! 
Steel Panther! Rarrrrrrrrrrr!!!!! 
you look gorgeous babes!! 
just landed mumma! Miss ya 
Hello London town! 
yaye 
One flight to go. Reading a cracker of a book called The Poison Tree. 
Half way home. Hello Madrid. Next plane please. Bed is calling me. 
not the best lady but made for funny filming! 
Adios rainy Ibiza. Had a fun shoot. Ready for my bed. 
thanks doll so sweet of ya 
you the coolest babe! You knitting more royal fam members? 
yes got her 10 years ago from the mayhew 
I'm not in london!!! 
always! 
When its raining just dance!  
Getting pretty soaked on this shoot. Its been a right laugh though.  
Good luck boyfriend face xx 
so soz man! Have an amazing gig! Xxxxx 
good for u doll x 
The rain is getting the way of our filming plans. The bikini I packed will not be used. 
yes its from range doll! 
I just slept for a very long time. Right coffee, then day two of the filming adventure. 
Just finished filming. Long yet great day. Hello bed! 
ah thanks babes 
The filming adventure continues. The day has been hectic, surprising and pretty blimmin funny! 
Trying to stay alert and awake as have a lot more to film today. 4am starts don't do it for me. 
Just saw a rainbow over a rainbow. Double trouble 
Have at last landed at destination. Let the filming adventure commence 
Have had to buy socks at the stop over airport as my new blue suede shoes have created juicy blisters 
Don't you step on my blue suede shoes.  
jeal! 
I love airports a lot but when your there so early that duty free isn't even open it loses some of its shine 
This is officially an early start. Off on a filming adventure for the weekend. Coffeeeeeeeee where are you? 
thanks doll 
Can't wait to present Rocks in Manchester and the Appeal Show! Not long now!! 
best album! 
Don't stop thinking about tomorrow it'll soon be here! 
Singing to Fleetwood Mac very loudly 
Playing Fleetwood Mac very loudly. 
thanks babes 
oh god I have only just seen this! Its the best news everrrrr 
Theyre from my range at BOOTS doll 
Gold leopard print nails and leggings today!  
thanks guys x 
yaye!!! 
yaye I'm still rocking the gold ones! 
yayeee love you jakeyyyy 
yayeee 
ha it took my hair dresser agesssss hahah! 
New drum and Bass tune coming up on my show in a bit! Radio1 
good tunes today 
wooop x 
fun night right!! was on top form! 
filming abroad muffin man call you after radio xx 
doll your jewellery is insane! LOVE IT!!! Thanks for letting me wear it last night at the Cosmos! 
loved our downton dinner 
Love you back lady! Thanks for your kind words last night!!! xxxxx 
Pooped. Bed and new feet, that aren't manipulated by triangular shoes, needed! Taxiiiiii 
Also my darling friend Kris from Coppafeel won ultimate campaigner! Love you Kris!! 
Cosmo awards were the most fun! Debbie Harry my idol picking up the errr Idol award! Amaze!! 
Don't forget Celebrity Juice on tonight on itv2!! 10pm 
yayeee 
ha thanks babes 
Yes I know! Glad you like huni 
ha thanks babes 
Ta mate 
Nails done for the Cosmo's tonight. Gold leopard print nail art from my range of at BOOTS.  
Off to rehearse for tonight Cosmo Ultimate Women awards! Then make up. My hair/eye bags need drastic help! 
yaye treat yourself! 
but are you on my mothers table? Thats right is coming along! 
ta luv xxxxxx 
yayeeee 
thanks man 
hahahah 
are you still drunk? 
ah thanks! 
ah thanks 
ah yes! Nervous/excited/need-me-hair-done 
Big day today. Radio1 at 10am and then im off to present the Ultimate Women of the Year awards! 
not the red thing. The wooly things!! 
Last nights celebrity juice was such a laugh! I got the oddest Christmas presents from Keith! One of them I weirdly quite like! 
Morning. Photos, Coldplay and Jam.  
About to record the celebrity juice christmas special! Get your baubles out! 
Listening to Friends album sampler in my dressing room! Niceeeeee tunes! 
About to record a celebrity juice special. Am dressed in a ridiculous costume. 
 YESSSSS!!!!! 
Lianne La Havas 'No Room for Doubt' = about as lush as it gets! 
Lianne La Havas 'No Room for Doubt' = about as lush as it gets! 
Kings of Leon 'fans' one of the happiest songs ever! Takes me to a nice place! 
Mr Jams incredible muffins!  
im on the radio so cant drink hot alcohol right now which is a big shame!!! 
ok this is happening washed down with a hot toddy! 
I love this advice!! Carrot cake? That's vit C right? 
dude I'm getting a bike shed build in my front yard next week! Its happening ha! 
Still got a cold. Day 4. The vitamin C army has let me down. Time to bring in the hot toddy troops! (After radio of course) 
cab driver asked if I could do an impression of posh spice. When I said no he went "oh go onnnn give it a try" errrr a) why and b) no! 
This cold is hanging around far too long. 
how am i NOT bored of Lana del reys Video Gmes yet! I just <3 it!! 
hahah 
NEW black keys on my show at 1235 ish radio1 
no probs ladss niceeeee tune 
you obviously didnt hear the Moyles hand over pops! Got the giggle big time! 
yes captain Barlow!! Celeb juices number 1 fan!! 
hahah Peach Cobbler anyone? 
Might turn the lights out, sit in silence and pretend im not at home in a minute! 
It gets worse. A mum reached over her children whilst smoking a cig and said "ill have one actually" then took a choc with her fag hand! 
i think i might hit the streets soon! 
"as many as you like" cut to him grabbing literally the whole lot with one hand 
Getting to grips with modern day trick-or-treating. One kid just asked how many sweets he could take. Made the mistake of saying... 
thanks darling #quiffhop for ever 
#quiffhop 
YES covering on my show in the live lounge 
NEXT on the show in the live lounge. Radio1 
ill do my best 
Happy halloween! Still full of cold, still got a flat tyre but I will play good music on the radio at 10am. 
ha kilroy the cat! 
Look who has joined me on the sofa. Keloy!!  
Still feeling awful. Still on the sofa in a blanket. 
well done mate! no.1!!! 
Delayed post tour cold. On the sofa wrapped in a blanket. Erggg 
Happy birthday to my gorgeous fella 
can not stop listening to this  
Nice gym sesh so feelin good but just got in car and have a flat tyre. Booooo! 
Morning you lot!! Might have gone a bit far with the halloween decorations in the house. 
old man 
thanks doll 
I keep forgetting its friday! Woooop! Halloween weekend, sleep time, and boyfriends birthday! Good times! 
Our biggest ratings yet for last nights Celebrity Juice! Hope you enjoyed the show! 
R1 Student Tour 2011 - Day 4 Norwich  my lads from UEA 
back in my studio at radio1! Weird being back here with no students around me! 
ha where is he going for halloween? 
London I've missed you. Walking to work thinking about this last mad week. #studentTour  
too much? Hahha 
Oh yes it does!!! 
You lot seem to be enjoying celebrity juice so far! The end is pretty unreal! Just wait... 
thanks man 
ahhh good good doll x x 
glad you've enjoyed it! 
ah bless ya! X 
In my place!!! Ahhh! I might have to cry a bit!  
Coldplay Norwich! #studentTour  
haha yaye! 
I just lost my on stage battle with zane! Boo! But lanky is here so its all good!  
Zane starting things off nicely in Norwich! Not long til coldplay!  
Off to see zane and Coldplay at their big gig in a bit. Get ready Norwich! 
Just had the deepest two hour sleep. Am I still in norwich? Who am I? What day is it? 
Don't forget its a mad one tonight on Celebrity Juice! get a brilliant surprise!!! ITV2 10pm! 
hahah 
ah thanks man! 
always! #nerdsrule 
Hope you enjoyed the show today! Immense watching Coldplay in a venue that small!! Lucky! Thanks Norwich! 
Coldplay sound checking in the blue bar. Hear them and see them online and on the red button at midday 
On radio1 on the red button and live online at bbc.co.uk/radio1 in 10 mins! 
ah thanks babes 
sozzzz very busy day xx 
Me and the corndog/horndog getting ready for the big show in Norwich!  
ah got your 'air cut all nice for coldplay! #kingofthecampus 
brilliant! Safe trip dude. Don't puke x 
oh no doll! A ferry!!!! 
they're off the scale today! Photo on the way 
yeah can't wait! Speak to you next week doll x 
Just met our students for the day! Lots of effort put in for our welcome today! Hear it on the show at 10am today #studentTour 
yaye glad you like!!! 
Thanks for coming on celebrity juice last night dude 
thanks dad luv ya x 
Realised on first tweet of the day today I put 'colplay' rather than COLDPLAY. Highlighting my sleepy eyes! 
Off to this mornings student house. Last day of the #studentTour 
Morning!!! Sleepy eyes. But hey it's COLPLAY day! #studentTour radio1 
Still in car on way to norwich. Slept for a bit but can not wait to get in to bed. Tomorrow industrial eye makeup needed! 
I know! I'm sorry baby! As its from kasabian its an exception! 
oh god I better be about! Let me check when I'm home friday dude 
The thing that will definitely keep me awake tomorrow is one of the BIGGEST bands in the world, Coldplay in the live lounge!! Ahhhh 
Now got a long car journey to Norwich for tomorrows #studentTour #tired 
Ha that's a pic of me in my kasabian Cotton shirt that I wore in make up! Thanks again lads! 
Funniest celebrity juice ever. You can see it on itv2 tomorrow. get quite a shock!  
yep. On planet zog. Miss you! Cake soon!! Xxx 
Hello welcome to twitter! See you tonight on celebrity juice 
At celebrity juice getting ready for the show. Not sure what planet I'm on. Back on the student tour tonight. 
Now on the way back down south to London town to film celebrity juice. Then car back up to Norwich. #studentTour #livingoutofasuitcase 
ha what has greg started! 
ah goodo! 
Kasabian in the Live lounge. One of my work highlights this year! Great Lana del Rey cover!!! Legends 
At the scholar bar at Leicester uni now prepping for the show. Just found out what Kasabian's mystery cover is! Amazing!! #studentTour 
Ps a lot of people saying my twitter was hacked last night. I'm looking in to it 
Off to our student house in Leicester. Eye bags at an all time HUGE. So excited about Kasabians Live Lounge later! #studentTour 
The lovely lot in our Leicester hotel have left cupcakes in my room! Sweet!!! 
yaye! 
Goodbye Hatfield. We're off to Leicester! Kasabian on my show tomorrow morning. 10am #studentTour 
Teenage kicks. RIP John Peel 
Flux pavilion is making the forum shake. Great set! Listen now live on radio1 
I'm playing Dolly Parton on Zanes show! Yes!!!!!!! Radio1 
Ps Zane has said I'm allowed to play one track on his show. I've picked a strong tune! 
On the way to see Zane at the Forum in hatfield. Example on radio1 from 7pm. 
ha hilarious right 
Example in the live lounge on our #studentTour next on radio1 
20 minutes until the show in Hatfield. Watch us live on the red button and online! #studentTour radio1 
On campus getting ready for the show at 10am. Press your red button or just on the R1 website to watch it all too! 
Hello Hatfield. Off to meet our students for the day then on air with Example in live lounge from 10am. #studentTour 
Corndog is driving and his map reading skills so far are perfect. 
On the way to Hatfield to prep for tomorrows show. #studentTour listening to Ben Howards album in the car 
ah thanks man 
Thanks Aberdeen. What a laugh! Thanks all the students who came along to hang and to NATW and mr Ben Howard! 
great tash dude! Miss ya 
Met our first student house in Aberdeen. Off to the venue for the show now. 10am radio1, online and on the red button! 
I AM up early and i AM slightly delirious but am I actually watching a gorilla drinking herbal tea on daybreak? 
When in a hotel room why do I have to scroll through every tv channel like I've never seen a tv before? 
QPR vs Chelsea = happy dad/brother and gutted boyfriend 
The aircon in the hotel gym in Aberdeen was on full blast. Near impossible to break a sweat. #softsoutherner 
First flight of the day done. Man on plane kept sneezing. Practically made myself a mask out of my jumper. 
Just wrapped. Long yet fun day of filming in france. Next stop Aberdeen for the radio1 student tour! 
Having a great first day filming. I'll tell you all about it soon. Today has been bike riding, eating french food and laughing! 
Cold yet gorgeous and sunny in France for our filming 
Good morning France. Here filming this weekend. I'll tell you what its for soon! 
its all your Verne!! 
Scott and his cake  
Hope your all feeling happy and good today gang. Big dance tune next up on the show! Radio1 NOW 
great to see you verne 
haha! No worries doll! Thanks again for a cracking live lounge! 
lovely lunch yesterday mrs. Ta! Great to see you! 
i miss you so much babs! As soon as im back off this student tour we are going out!!! 
Time for a crazy 7 days. A new place every day, planes, trains, and automobiles. suitcaselife 
Celebrity Juice on itv2 now!! My mate is back on the show! 
Zane is a cheat! Fact! #weakcheater 
That's right David Bowie. Whammmm! (Punch to the gut) 
Zane vs ME on radio1 right now! 
Just done the voice over for the Live lounge volume 6 cd. Sooo many good tracks on there! Get ready! 
thanks me darlin! HUGE Live Lounge today! 
Greg he liked your rap! Unreal i know! 
if i could swear live on air i would have! That was a frikkin good live lounge right there! 
The near marriage proposal was a good first move on Labrinths part too! haha 
This is why i LOVE my job. Labrinth and Tiny in the live lounge right now! Spectacular!!!!! 
Labrinth in the live lounge with Tiny NEXT on radio 1!! 
you still wearing your jesus neckalususususus 
dude great news about Kasabian tour! We'll be there! 
yes it is 
sleepy eyes today but excited for Labrinth in the live lounge later! radio1 
Just finished filming. Longgg day but laughed a lot. Laughter is the best. Nighttttttt gang! 
Tomorrow on celebrity juice I've got my old mate Vern back  
Lunch on the run. Off to celebrity juice now. 
EAT IT!!!! Its calling your name! 
it took you this long to work that one out? 
xx 
yaye hey doll! 
photos, cake and shoes  
yaye 
ah bless ya babes thanks 
Trevor's holiday vibes  
have fun baby! 'im in a glass case of emotion!!!' 
At home after a long day. Feet up, take out, Entourage series 7 just arrived on dvd in the post! YES!! 
Got some early Beatles belting out on the shoot. Niceeee 
Day two of the spring summer  shoot. Let's do this 
maybe you could build a house sized glitter shoe to live in? 
I know! Serious 
Miu miu love <3  
ah thanks guys!! Love a bit of check! 
yes love it! I just got a pie cook book! Im gonna get on that one! 
i knew you would! All sort of creepy and dark. You listening to me whilst making a pie?? 
thanks love xx 
Rob Brydon who just left my studio with cake  
Thanks so much for coming on the show! sorry about Cornish in those flip flops! 
its you or Adrian Chiles doll! 
if you missed this earlier PLAY IT now. Its a dream boat of a cover  (i may sound demanding but you just MUST!) 
Long yet fun  photo shoot over. Now prepping for Rob Brydon interview for tomorrows show on Radio1! 
Band of Skulls new tune is still blowing my mind!!! 
ha!!!! Love ya 
rob Brydon would like you to interview him tomrrow rather than me!! 
such a good point! hahah 
Bombay bicycle club covering Lana Del rey!!!!! This is a dream come true!! 
Bombay Bicycle Club in the live lounge! Dreamy! 
im forcing you to eat one later!!! 
ha BEETROOT! Big mispelling on the home page. Not my fault. Chill out! 
Beatroot and Chocolate Brownies  
no worries babes! you rock! 
BEETROOT brownies in the stu stu studio! 
she may be walking the dog ill ask her if she can fit you in her schedule? are you down?? 
she may be walking the dog ill ask her if she can fit you in her schedule? are you down?? 
hello your on my show tomorrow! Woop! Shall i bring my mother in to work? 
Morning!!! Bombay Bicycle Club in the Live lounge on my show today! 
Today I baked chocolate brownies once again featuring a mystery veg. I will test these out on my radio1 team tomorrow 
Chilled day. Been for a run, strolling in the market, and now getting a pedi. My feet are like trotters after walking to work last week. 
Still can not stop listening to this. Gorgeous  
put the kettle on for me later dolly 
 LOVE these guys! 
LOOK i am actually tweeting you! #unfollow 
thanks babes@HarrietTN 
"its boring but its part of my daily routine" 
good to see you too ps ive got a lovely potato for you! 
yaye so glad you like them! The pink brushes are my faves too! 
hahah hilarious 
Just walked in to work. Took about an hour and was lovely. #sunnylondon 
errrr yes he has just told me!! ahhhhh 
ridiculously BEAUTIFUL  
Glad you lot are enjoying tonight's celebrity juice! My hair might look a bit like Keith's tonight! #shame 
Just finished shooting the very advert. You'll see it on tv soon! #earlychristmasfun 
Celebrity Juice on itv2 tonight 10pm. Soap special with much hilarity. 
Getting the giggles on set with Holly. Unnecessary noises coming from Holly when only silent acting is required haha! 
Am taking a huge faux fur blanket with me to wrap up in between takes. I'm always cold #wimp 
Just had a lovely walk home from radio. Now off to finish of the  advert with Holly. #nightshoot 
 some videos from my weekend 
Loving the Horro's in today's Live Lounge! What lovely chaps and so good live! 
Horror's in the live lounge next on the show! Radio1 now! Pop cover on the way! 
thank you poppet 
Morning. Live lounge with The Horros today! What are they going to cover? find out at on my show today! 10am radio1 
ohh thanks guys! 
Slippers crew!  
Fearne and her cakes!!!  my courgette cakes 
my boyfriend is now on twitter but is clueless as to what its all about! Welcome him along! 
yes got the slipperooni's on! 
CUTE 
SLIPPERS!  These are the Ethel's 
from the veggie cake book Kris got me! 
 mint choc cupcakes featuring a mystery vegetable! Find out WHAT on my show in a bit 
Watched Senna last night. Balled my eyes out. An incredibly powerful, intoxicating piece of film. 
ME!!!!! Miss you muffino What you up to? 
This tune is blowing my mind at the moment  ahhhhhhhhhh 
Like Reggies outdoor slippers?  
yes so sweet of you thanks doll! x 
Ha woops *RECORD of the week. Tweeting early with sleepy eyes! 
Morning gang! On radio 1 from 10am with my Wu Lyf Recrod of the week, Student Tour news and good tunes! 
on the show today popped in with big news  
ta doll xxx 
thanks guys! I designed it! Glad you likey! 
What an amazing new tune! Can not wait for the album guys! 
ah thanks poppet 
New Band of Skulls on my show next. I have missed this band!! #radio1 
Looking forward to a busy day. My show on Radio 1 then off to shoot a very advert with Holly. Big bowl of cereal first. 
thanks doll 
I look slightly bonkers but here I am with the delightful  
My ears will never recover from the noise out on that stage! So many happy teenagers going mad at the teen awards!! 
Me and Tinchy about to go on stage at the Teen awards  
Just seen Tinchy who I'm presenting an award with today. He was eating a bag of crisps for breakfast! Tut tut! 
On my way to the Radio1 teen awards! Not used to wearing painful high shoes on a sunday. Would it be unprofessional to wear slippers? 
The Michael Jackson concert was such fun. Sang and danced (off stage) to every number. Much enjoyed hosting with Jamie Foxx too! 
yes muffino 
ha mega sweet of you 
Rehearsals done. The show looks amazing. Just seen Prince, Paris and Blanket back stage and they look really excited. Not long now! 
Just stepped out on the big stage here in Cardiff at the stadium! Rehearsals in a bit then the big show at 6pm 
Nice! its one of my faves! So cosy! 
always! 
Beautiful sunset whilst driving to Cardiff. Bon iver, Feist, Mazzy star and Dylan LeBlanc on the I pod 
On the way to Cardiff for the Michael Jackson tribute concert on saturday. Might have a little kip in the car. Love a disco nap. 
yaye!! 
you look so wistful in your profile pic Bundy ! 
Billy Connelly's route 66 is tv perfection. Great sound track too! 
Less than an hour until Celebrity Juice! Itv2 10pm #bangtidy 
You know what day it is...yup Celebrity Juice time! (And err...Thursday) 
On a shoot with Holly for very.co.uk Hairspray wafting in the air, shoes everywhere and David Bowie on the stereo 
Hales I <3 you!!! xxx 
Yesterday myself and did an unusual photo shoot. Nothing dodge just quite funny. Youll see the results soon! 
love ya 
This Saturday!  
are you there now? I miss you so much!! I STILL have your birthday present!! 
ah thanks babes! Ill be back monday 
congrats babes!!!! 
soz babes back on monday xxx 
This Saturday i will also be co presenting the Michael Jackson tribute concert with Jamie Foxx in Cardiff. Who is coming along? 
i want! 
so bad!!!!! cant.move.arms 
I wont be on radio 1 for the rest of the week. Working on some other projects intensely. Will be back Monday folks! 
Listening to the Dan P Carter playing some smashing tunes 
Needing a wee and being stuck in traffic is one of my least favourites. 
yaye is listening to my show! 
do you actually remember it?? 
this is utterly stunning  
Just went to see the George Harrison film Living in the Material World. Beautiful, massively insightful and generally inspiring. 
Sun shining (woop), eating mango (lush), wearing summer dress from my range at very (yaye), boyf has footie on radio (yawn) 
Had a really fun time dressing up like one of my style icons for a very.co.uk shoot today. You'll see who soon. Ps its not Keith Lemon! 
Off to Maida Vale for our Ceelo Green Live Lounge special! Watch it all LIVE online at bbc.co.uk/radio1 later! 
ah lucky! Have fun babes! Wanna see your new house when your back! 
yes gurl it looks hot. As always you have the best hair! 
Off out for a girls dinner with Amanda and Den. Don't forget Celebrity Juice tonight at 10pm. Its a naughty one tonight 
yes listen again online. First half hour of the show! You were a heavy feature! 
ah sweet thanks luv 
Last nights Celebrity Juice was one of the rudest ever. Not sure how they are going to edit it for the TV! Watch it tonight. ITV2 10pm! 
Getting ready for Celebrity Juice. Keith's shirt tonight is amazing. 
cake and NEW make up!  
thanks man! 
check out my orange cake and 's incredible icing creations!  
let's have a bake off! 
ill bake you one babes! 
ha thanks man 
The orange cake I have just made. Yum!  
Baking a nice orange cake for my mates birthday. Fella watching the footie. I tired again to watch a bit, but I'd rather be baking! 
ha no! Runs are great! 'Awful cake' now that's an oxymoron 
Just had a gorgeous run in Hyde park. A nice way to finish my day. 
never a bad thing! 
Just finished the shoot for very.co.uk, what a gorgeous evening in London town. Hello late summer! 
oh yaye! 
8pm, C4. Gok's Clothes Roadshow! Watch my darling friend on tv tonight! 
Off to do another Christmas very.co.uk shoot with Please no more mince pies today! Its so wrong in September! 
THANK YOU llama chops miss you 
This happened yesterday.  
nirvana cover from on my show now!! radio 1 
this is great news! Defo clipping that one for the show tomorrow! 
 Taylor time 
Taylor Lautner was lovely! Photo online soon!! James Morrison in the Live Lounge in a bit! 
Ryan Adams new album is a dream. 
Today my best mate Kye is running a half marathon for coppafeel. Sending him so much love and luck! 
What a beautiful day! T shirt on, winter coat banished, big smile on! Have a gorgeous sunday you lot! 
good tip guys! Thanks 
A baking filled morning. Mini chocolate loaf cakes and a sponge that got stuck in a new 'non stick' castle shaped tin. 
yaye! Lovely! 
yaye glad you like! 
ha! ta xx 
ah thanks babes xx 
Some photos of what ive been up to recently. Blog time  
hello! 
Thanks for being my team mate lady! Those boots!!! 
thanks luv 
French bread time itv2 
ah that's lovely thanks doll 
French bread based fun on Celebrity juice 10pm itv2! Ouuuusshhhhh!!! 
see you soon beesh 
 check out 's concentrating face during the vending machine game! ha 
Tonights Celebrity Juice is a goodun. French bread used in a unique way on tonights show! 
My belated birthday cake from the celebrity juice team! THANKS guys!  
Just finished filming two celebrity juices. My face aches from laughing! 
It was a mix of Mac's a girl about town and rimmel lily extase 
During my fashion show last night the sound track was Edward Sharpe and the MZ's, Broken Bells, Little Dragon and Foster the People 
thanks luv 
me and the big dawggg  
thanks guys xxx 
thanks babes 
ouch! my hair is soo afro and i have eye bags bigger than yours yesterday! I may text you a pic! 
sleepy eyes today. Long yet fun day ahead. radio1 then 2 Celebrity Juice's to record. Lets do this! 
have a wicked time doll and lets hang when your home xx 
Emile Sande! Wow. Jools on bbc2 now! 
Thanks soooo much mumma love you 
Thanks so much for coming tonight and you met mumma cotton! 
Home now. Shattered but happy. Time for the new Later with Jools Holland! 
thanks babes 
thanks hun 
thanks so much for coming t the show style crush for ever!! <3 
i was quivering with nerves back stage as this was going on!  
my gorgeous models getting ready to hit the catwalk earlier!  
Oh wow. We did it. My fashion show went well and I'm over the moon. My total style crush Whitney Port turned up too! Over the moon! 
Also say hello to my make up chica and who is doing my hair today. 
An hour to go until people start arriving for my fashion show! Ah! Nervous now! 
Welcome my stylist to twitter! 
no they don't they love him. Ha! See you tonight at my show! 
On the way to the venue for my fashion show. Eye bags need removing, hair needs brushing, and stomach needs spanx. Goodbye italian gut! 
what a lovely chap is. Top cover of Emile Sande too! WOW!! 
Miles Kane sounding class in the live lounge right now on my show! 
LOVE Lana Del Ray <3 
cool got my fashion show if you fancy it x 
yes im there! You around at 530pm today? 
ill play some Britney for you! You on your way to London town? 
no worries baby cakes love ya 
Morning! Got Miles Kane in the live lounge today on my show. Then off for my very.co.uk fashion show! 
Tomorrow at 630pm you'll be able to watch my fashion show for very.co.uk LIVE at heatworld.com 
 popped in to my studio earlier! 
a lovely surprise guest in the form of on my show! Thanks cousin Matthew! 
thanks man 
yaye hey!! 
i miss you when can we hang 
juat walked in to my studio and has filled it with balloons with pictures of his face on! What a welcome home! 
hello pops! Italian dinner out soon?? miss ya 
I'm back on radio1 at 10am today! Looking forward to seeing the gang! Havnt had a hug off moyles in 2 weeks! 
Also will be back on with the celebrity juice team this week. I may have even missed Keith a bit! 
Back in blighty. Had a lovely hols in italy. Back on radio1 tomorrow. Craving pasta already! 
Back in blighty. Had a lovely hols in italy. Back on radio1 tomorrow. Craving pasta already! 
Might have just told my boyfriend the ending to One Day without knowing he had just bought the book. Woops! 
Happy birthday to my gorgeous god son Bram! Love ya Bramble. X 
Reading a cracking book by Sarah Outen called A dip in the Ocean! What an incredible gal! 
Ah just found out Downton Abbey starts again on Sunday!!! can you Pleaseee sky plus it for me! 
ah thanks x 
Just found out last night Celebrity Juice won a tv choice award! Wooop! I'm out of the country but hear the gang celebrated in fine style! 
Now reading The Mysterious Affair at Styles, Poirot's First Case. I'm pretty gripped! 
Reading The Rum Diary by Hunter S.Thompson. What a book! 
Also back to school special Celebrity Juice on itv2 tonight! Oushhhhh 
My cosmopolitan cover is out. During the shoot (in skimpy playsuit) Larry & George Lamb walk in. Cut to me in embarrassed foetal position 
Had an amazing facial today that got me for my 30th! Thanks Mr F! 
Had an amazing facial today that got me for my 30th! Thanks Mr F! 
Had an amazing facial today that got me for my 30th! Thanks Mr F! 
Had an amazing facial today that got me for my 30th! Thanks Mr F! 
Had an amazing facial today that got me for my 30th! Thanks Mr F! 
Had an amazing facial today that got me for my 30th! Thanks Mr F! 
Had an amazing facial today that got me for my 30th! Thanks Mr F! 
Had an amazing facial today that got me for my 30th! Thanks Mr F! 
Had an amazing facial today that got me for my 30th! Thanks Mr F! 
Had an amazing facial today that got me for my 30th! Thanks Mr F! 
Had an amazing facial today that got me for my 30th! Thanks Mr F! 
Had an amazing facial today that got me for my 30th! Thanks Mr F! 
Had an amazing facial today that got me for my 30th! Thanks Mr F! 
Had an amazing facial today that got me for my 30th! Thanks Mr F! 
